It is unique in that its expression is regulated directly by hypoxia.
These properties are now being exploited in attempts aimed at the induction of new blood vessels in pathological situations such as ischemic heart disease.
Five VEGF forms of 121 to 206 amino-acids are produced from a single gene by alternative splicing.
Cells expressing VEGF usually express several forms simultaneously.
VEGF121 does not contain exons 6 and 7 of the gene and consequently lacks a heparin binding ability.
However, this form is fully  active as an inducer of angiogenesis, and as a blood vessel permeabilizing agent.
Exon 6 and 7 contain 2 independent heparin binding domains.
The VEGF form containing exon 7 (VEGF165) and the vascular endothelial growth factor form containing exon 6 (VEGF145) display similar biological potencies raising the question of why so many VEGF forms are required.
It was found that VEGF121 diffuses better because it does not bind to heparan-sulfate proteoglycans.
In contrast, VEGF145 binds to extracellular matrix ad is released from it slowly.
When the receptor binding properties of VEGF121 and VEGF165 were compared it was found that VEGF165 binds to a class of VEGF receptors that is not recognized by VEGF121.
These receptors are encoded by the neuropilin-1 gene, and we have recently found that the related neuropilin-2 gene also encodes a VEGF165 receptor.
We have recently found evidence indicating the neuropilins form complexes with another VEGF receptor, VEGFR-1.
However, the biological function of this complex remains to be elucidated.
In addition to mucositis and myelotoxicity as well known early reactions after radiotherapy or radiochemotherapy in advanced head and neck tumors, late toxicity following treatment is an often underestimated problem.
The healing of wounds by secondary  intention is a simple method to close  operative defects.
The quality of wound healing will depend on the anatomic site on the face as well as on size and depth of the  defect.
Best functional and cosmetic results are obtained at locations with concave  geometry and when the defect lies  symmetrically at the interface of two  anatomic subunits.
Partial reconstruction or guiding sutures can create a symmetric  defect in relation to anatomic subunits which will heal by second intention.
This simple and efficient operative procedure is ilustrated by two case reports.
Background: Acute infectious mononucleosis (IM) is a selflimiting lymphoproliferative disease of EBV-infected (immortalised) B cells and poly-/oligoclonal cytotoxic T cells which are to a high percentage EBV-specific.
In B cells EBV infection mainly leads to a latent infection with expression of EBV nuclear antigens 1-6 (EBNA1-6) and membrane antigens 1, 2A and 2B (LMP1, LMP2A and LMP2B).
Expression of these EBV latent antigens leads to transformation and immortalisation of infected B cells.
Here we examined if also lytic EBV genes (i.e.
BZLF1), which are associated with a productive EBV infection, are expressed during IM.
Arrhythmogenic right ventricular cardiomyopathy (ARVCM) is a frequent underlying disease in young patients with ventricular tachycardia (VT) and sudden death.
Treatment is frequently indicated and is mainly directed at the prevention of ventricular tachyarrhythmias and sudden death.
In a minority of patients with progressive ARVCM and clinical signs of heart failure, pharmacological treatment with vasodilators, diuretics, and digitalis may be required.
A prospective study was performed to compare the sensitivity and accuracy of ultrasound (US), computed tomography (CT), and single photon emission computed tomography (SPECT) as a bone scan to detect subclinical invasion of the mandible by squamous cell carcinoma of the oral cavity and floor of mouth.
The typical clinical features of myasthenia gravis are weakness and excessive fatiguability of striated muscles that increases during the course of the day or after strenous exercise.
Ocular muscle involvement with ptosis (in 50%) and diplopia (in 25%) are the most common initial signs.
The disease can progress to bulbar muscles and to all other striated muscles (generalized myasthenia).
The muscle fatiguability and a fluctuating course can mislead to a diagnosis of neurasthenia.
Since the treatment of myasthenia gravis is directed at the pathogenetic mechanisms of the disease an early diagnosis is of great significance for the course of the disease.
Also, a false positive diagnosis of myasthenia has to be avoided because of the potentially hazardous side effects of the therapy.
The mainstay of the diagnosis is the history and a subtle clinical examination with tests of excessive muscle fatiguability.
The injection of edrophonium (Tensilon), the electrodiagnostic testing after repitive stimulation (decrement test) and the testing for serum antibodies against acetylcholin receptors have to be performed to secure the diagnosis of myasthenia.
The edrophonium test and the decrement test can yield false positive results in other neuromuscular diseases.
Antibodies are present in 50% of ocular myasthenia and in 80-90% of the generalized form.
The Lambert-Eaton myasthenic syndrome, other neuromuscular diseases, mitochondrial diseases, diseases of the cranial nerves, botulism and the rare congenital myasthenic syndromes have to be considered as differential diagnosis.
The application of biodegradable implants is combined with advantages and disadvan- tages.
They offer a great deal of innovative ideas.
Best evaluation has been done with pins for the fixation of low loaded osteochondral fractures.
When using 2,7 mm Polypin primary mechanical stabilility of distal radius fractures is comparable with the fixation by 1,8 mm K-wires.
A prospective and randomised study with two years follow up, including 183 radial head fractures, showed no significant difference in results and complications in metal and polyactide implants.
For this localisation and other comparable indications the implant can be recommended.
Despite the more extensive degradable device overall costs can be reduced with the polymer implant.
Orien- truded polyactide screws showed good clinical results, newetheless resorption was extremely late within 5 to 7 years.
The treatment of deep cartilage defects is a challenge for every orthopeadic surgeon.
The potention for regeneration of cartilage tissue is minimal and leads to mechanically inferior fibrous tissue.
The established techniques induce the growth of fibrous tissue but fail to prevent arthrosis.
Autologous chondrocyte transplantation seems to be the most promising therapy concept with clinical relevance to reserves a full thickness cartilage defekt with hyaline-like cartilage.
Outcome studies with a follow up from 2-10 years show in up to 90 % good and excellent results for defects on the femoral condyle and 70 % for the patella.
Mechanical testing of the regenerated cartilage showed almost simular stiffness as nearly normal hyaline cartilage.
The available data justify the acceptance of autologous chondrocyte transplantation as a standard procedure for limited indications and well-trained surgeons.
Result of already inaugurated studies will show the potential of chondrocyte transplantation to prevent osteoarthritis.
Vasculitides are rare diseases characterized by inflammation of blood vessels.
According to diameter of the blood vessels involved in the inflammatory process, the clinical presentation and the histological appearance, different vasculitic syndromes may be distinguished.
Primary vasculitides are of unknown origin while secondary vasculitides may be caused by drugs, malignancy or infection.
Panarteriitis nodosa caused by chronic Hepatitis B and mixed cryoglobulinemia secondary to chronic Hepatitis C are classical examples of vasculitides triggered by infections.
However, these are rare complications of chronic viral hepatitis.
Patients infected by HIV frequently suffer from vasculitis, which may be caused by opportunistic infections and by defects in immune regulation.
In numerous case reports, various other infectious particles have been reported to cause different forms of vasculitis, either by direct infection of endothelial cells or by induction of an immunologic process leading to blood vessel destruction.
Immunologically mediated vasculitis secondary to infection may be due to a predisposing reactivity of the patient's immune system.
After successful treatment of the infection, the vasculitis usually subsides.
Therefore, all patients with vasculitis should be evaluated for underlying infection.
To calculate canal compromise and decrease of midsagittal diameter caused by retropulsion of fragments into the spinal canal we analyzed the pre- and postoperative computed tomographies of 32 patients with unstable thoracolumbar burst fractures treated by USS (universal spine system).
Our intention was to examine the efficiency of ultrasound guided repositioning of the dispaced fragments which was performed in all 32 cases.
We found a clear postoperative enlargement of canal area (ASP preoperatively 55 %, postop.
80 %) and midsagittal diameter (MSD preop.
10 of 13 patients presented a postoperative improvement of neurological deficit, no neurological deterioration occured.
Fractures with neurological deficit showed more canal compromise (52 %) and less midsagittal diameter (MSD compromise 51 %) than those without (40 % or 39 %).
There was no correlation between the percentage of spinal canal stenosis and the severity of neurological deficit.
Below L 1 the spinal canal is greater than between Th 11 and L 1, so a more important spinal stenosis is tolerated.
In case of unstable burst fractures with neurological deficit the ultrasound guided spinal fracture reposition is an effective procedure concerning the necessary improvement of spinal stenosis: an additional ventral approach for the revision of the spinal canal is unneeded.
In fractures without neurologic deficit the repositioning of the displaced fragments promises an avoidance of long-term damages such as myelopathia and claudicatio spinalis.
In common the traumatic spondylolisthesis is not a life threatening injury.
An exact diagnosis is mandatory as well as a differentiated therapy.
Especially the correct decision about the therapy (operative vs conservative) including the technical demanding operative procedures is based on an experienced surgeon.
These patients should be transferred to a specialised centre.
The intensity of DNA degradation in fixed tissues is dependent on the fixation solution and the fixation time.
The aim of this study was the investigation of DNA degradation over fixation times of up to 70 days in different tissues (muscle, brain, liver, bone) and with different formalin concentration (2 %, 4 %, 8 %; unbuffered).
An additional test was performed to see whether the fixed tissues could be individualized using PCR analysis.
The smallest amounts of DNA were extracted from liver and brain and the largest from muscle and bone.
The amount of DNA that could be extracted decreased with increasing formalin concentration, while at the same time DNA degradation increased.
With the PCR-VNTR system HUMTH 01, all fixed samples could be typed regardless of the fixation time and the formalin concentration.
The draining sinus is an unpleasant complication of acne conglobata, acne fulminans, acne inversa, rosacea conglobata and rosacea fulminans (pyoderma faciale).
It is most common on the face, especially in the nasolabial folds, and on the neck below the mandibular line.
Clinically, it is an elongated (2-5 cm long), elevated, periodically inflamed lesion, which sporadically discharges pus.
The lesion persists with no tendency to spontaneous regression.
Histopathologically, it consists of elaborate, epithelialized galleries connected to the skin surface at multiple points.
It contains corneocytes, hairs, bacteria, serum, inflammatory cells and epitheloid granulomas.
A surgical thread placed into the skin provides a model in which the generation of sinus tracts can be studied.
Intralesional corticosteroid injection, cryosurgery and isotretinoin are not always very effective.
Sometimes complete excision of the lesion is necessary.
The draining sinus is a special form of scar analogous to the pilonidal cyst.
A thoracic outlet syndrome is only rarely caused by osseous anomalies.
Instead, it is a soft-tissue disease, where the C8 and T1 roots or the proximal inferior trunk of the brachial plexus are compressed by fibromuscular anomalies between the inferior cervical spine and the first rib or pleura.
Thoracic outlet syndrome is a clinical diagnosis.
If surgery is recommended, it should be concentrated on the fibromuscular anomalies and not on the first rib.
Transaxillary removal of the first rib carries an important risk of serious complications.
Among these, brachial plexus injury is the most frequent one.
Objective: The objective of this survey was to investigate the current status of the epidural and intrathecal management in patients with chronic cancer and non-cancer pain in Germany and Austria.
Methods: In June 1997 a questionnaire was sent to 598 German and Austrian anaesthesiologists specialized in pain therapy.
Questions concerning the use of medicaments for epidural and intrathecal treatment of chronic pain were asked.
Results: The response rate was 23%.
The data show that 78% of the anaesthesiologists use epidural or intrathecal analgesia in the therapy of chronic pain.
Local anaesthetics are used by 85% of these anaesthesiologists, followed by morphine (72%), clonidine (48%), buprenorphine (34%), baclofen (20%), fentanyl (13%) and sufentanil (10%).
For most of the treatments local anaesthetics are used, again followed by opioids und clonidine.
In the 137 answering pain clinics 79.821 epidural and intrathecal analgetic treatments are performed per year.
Discussion: Epidural and intrathecal pain therapy is frequently used in Germany and Austria, either as a complementary or alternative treatment to systemic pain therapy.
Local anaesthetics followed by opioids are the most commonly used medicaments for this treatment.
For some of the applied substances neurotoxicological data are lacking.
The use of these substances has to be considered very carefully.
Intraartial conduction disturbances (IACD) are the known substrate of re-entrant atrial arrhythmias and their diagnosis is important for the selection of proper therapy.
Signs of IACD can be missed on the standard ECG, and signal averaged (SA) P wave analysis has proved valuable for the evaluation of electrophysiological (EPS) properties of atrial myocardium.
Unfavourable EPS effects of RAA pacing are known to electrophysiologists, but this aspect is rarely considered in normal practice, and RAA based pacing modes remain standard even for pts.
We examined and compared EPS effects of different atrial pacing modes using two diagnostic tools: IEGM obtained from two atrial leads of biatrial pacing system (via telemetry) and time domain analysis of SA P wave in 22 pts.
with BiA pacing system (implanted due to atrial arrhythmias and IACD).
The results showed that different atrial pacing modes influence atrial activation timing parameters differently: RAA pacing aggravates IACD in comparison to sinus rhythm; the effects of CS pacing is less visible.
BiA pacing normalises all atrial activation times.
The normalisation of SA P wave duration, reduction of SA P wave dispersion, increasing of RMS 20 and decreasing of LAS 5 and finally abolition of presence of late atrial potentials in most of pts.
indicates beneficial effects of BiA pacing (in pts.
with IACD) in comparison to sinus rhythm and RAA pacing.
Unfavourable EPS effects of RAA pacing in patients with IACD indicates suitability the need for alternative (resynchronising) atrial pacing modes.
Time domain analysis of SA P wave is a valuable and sensitive diagnostic tool for non-invasive evaluation of EPS effects of different modes of atrial pacing.
Background: We report a case of irreversible unilateral hypoglossal nerve palsy in connection with nasal septum surgery in intubation anaesthesia.
On account of the spatial distance, there is no danger of injuring the hypoglossal nerve during nasal surgery.
However, in the otorhinolaryngological and anaesthesiological literature, some cases of hypoglossal palsy following endotracheal intubation, use of the laryngeal mask airway, bronchoscopy and laryngoscopy are reported.
The endoscopic guided puncture tracheostomy has established itself in many intensive care units.
Manufacturers offer complete tracheostomy kits, based on the described techniques from Ciaglia (Cook-Set), as well as from Griggs (Portex-Set).
The goal of this investigation was to show the advantages, disadvantages, costs and risks of the puncture tracheostomy and to make a comparison using conventional procedures.
Chronic lymphoplasmacellular osteomyelitis may occur in children, adolescents and adults, but has not been found in newborns or babies either in our series or in the literature.
Symptoms suggesting an acute disease like fever are uncommon, but a primary chronic course with symptomatic and asymptomatic periods is typical.
Pain and swelling are the main symptoms; painless masses are rare.
In children and adolescents the clavicle and metaphyseal regions of long bones are typical sites of chronic abacterial osteomyelitis.
In adults the clavicles or the first two ribs are mainly affected with synovitis of the adjacent joints, but the long bones are rarely involved.
Laboratory findings are non-specific but important for the differential diagnosis.
The sedimentation rate and c-reactive protein might be elevated.
The X-ray examination shows osteolytic, sclerotic or mixed bony changes and, in case of a diaphyseal involvement, onionskinlike periosteal bone formation may be present, suggesting a malignant process.
In late stages sclerotic bone formations may be seen as a rest.
Uni- or multifocal lesions can be detected by bonescan, as can asymptomatic lesions.
Magnetic resonance imaging shows gross signal intensity differences both in the bone and perifocal soft tissue and involvement of the synovium with gadolinium DPTA enhancement in T1-weighted images.
In early stages of the disease granulocytes, microabscesses and new bone formations might suggest bacterial osteomyelitis that cannot be differentiated by histology.
In intermediate phases lymphocytic and plasmacellular infiltrates are found, whereas in late phases sclerotic bone formations and fibrosis of the bone marrow are seen histologically.
In chronic lymphoplasmacellular osteomyelitis, all clinical, radiological and histological findings, as well as negative bacteriological cultures, are mandatory and will allow a definitive diagnosis to be made.
The disease may be uni- or multifocal, and new bone lesions may occur over time, as well as skin manifestations, which can be found years before or after bone involvement.
The association with dermatological diseases and/or synovitis led to the acronym SAPHO syndrome (synovitis, acne, pustulosis, hyperostosis, osteomyelitis).
For the treatment non-steroidal anti-inflammatory drugs are effective for pain relief, reduction of swelling and dysfunction.
Antibiotics have been used in several series and are not effective.
Major surgery is not recommended even for recurrences, and the prognosis for growth and function is excellent in the long term despite recurrences over several years.
A woman with severe stiff-man syndrome showed periodic cardiovascular dysregulation.
The blood pressure changed spontaneously every 5-10 min.
This rhythm was also maintained after relaxation.
However, the vegetative and motoric disturbances disappeared after intrathecal application of baclofen.
It is speculated that spinal GABAergic mechanisms are responsible for the tonic regulation of the cardiovascular system.
The frequency and prognostic relevance of sarcoid-likelesions and microcarcinosis in regional lymph nodes in gastric cancer (n = 113; pT1-3, pN0-1, pM0, R0) were investigated; the prognostic value was compared with pT and pN stage, grading and Laurén's tumor classification with Cox's multivariate regression-model.
Sarcoid like lesions were found in 34 % of the cases (n = 113).
Statistical analysis did not indicate that they had any prognostic value or showed whether or not microcarcinosis or metastasis was present; they were independent of pT stage, histological tumor type, tumor grading, and the clinical course of disease.
Microcarcinosis (defined as scattered carcinoma cells within lymph node sinuses or pulp without adjacent stromal reaction) was revealed by immunohistochemistry in 90 % of pN0 cases; the presence of 3 or more tumor cells per lymph node section in over 10 % of sampled lymph nodes per case carried a significant prognostic value.
In microcarcinosis without evidence of metastasis, the number of tumor cells and the number of involved lymph nodes are of prognostic value.
In pN1 cases microcarcinosis was found as well as the metastases in 97 % and had no additional prognostic value.
Microcarcinosis alone has a different significance from lymph node metastasis for prognosis.
This article summarizes the most important results of the Turku Conference on active strategies for an aging workforce, which took place in Turku/Finland in 1999.
About 140 experts from all EU-member states participated.
The article can be seen as a contribution to the current change in the debate on labor market policy concerning older workers in Germany.
The incidence of coronary artery aneurysm varies in the range from 0.2% to 4.9%.
Ninety per cent of these were associated with atherosclerotic coronary artery disease, where vessel ectasia and poststenotic dilatations are not an infrequent finding.
We present the case of a 67 year old patient with coronary artery aneurysm and coexisting coronary artery disease of the right coronary artery.
The patient was symptomatic and had a posterolateral myocardial infarction.
We performed a PTCA and stent-implantation of the stenosis and coronary artery aneurysm of the right coronary artery.
After the procedure, the patient could be discharged without angina pectoris.
A control-angiography will be performed six months later.
TMLR (Transmyocardial laser revascularization) is a disputed cardiosurgical technique available in Europe since 1994 that aims to deliver additional blood flow to ischemic myocardium from the left heart chamber.
Goal of our study is morphological examination of laser channels in human hearts to answer the questions: Are there patent laser channels with communication to the left chamber and to intramural vessels?
We examined hearts of 10 patients who died during the first 18 days after TMLR.
Channels were examined in histological serial sections under the light microscope.
Laser channels in the first days postoperatively have a lumen diameter of about 1 mm and are surrounded by coagulation necrosis about 500 µm thick.
Despite phagocytic removal of necrotic tissue the lumen diameter decreases during the following two weeks.
Open intramyocardial channels can be shown in all patients.
These channels communicate with intramural vessels, but in no instance with chamber lumen.
Our results suggest that clinical benefits are based on improved distribution of coronary blood.
Additional blood is not delivered from left chamber lumen to the myocardium.
However, our patients represent the small subgroup of the deceased.
If similar observations can be made in the majority of patients living symptomfree after TMLR remains open.
Recurrent miscarriages are, like sporadically occurring miscarriage, often (approx.
50 %) due to chromosomal aberrations.
An undefined proportion of the other half may be due to immunological incompliances.
The basis for this assumption is the fact that the maternal immune system recognizes paternal antigens and rejects them.
The initial hypothesis that such immune reaction is due to a high similarity between the maternal and paternal HLA systems (HLA sharing) is most likely incorrect.
Nevertheless, the incomplete recognition of the fetus by the maternal immune system and the resulting insufficient protection is basis for the active immune therapy with partner or donor lymphocytes.
Several placebo-controlled studies have been performed.
Due to the small number of cases, results were not significant.
A metaanalysis of all studies, however, proves significant effects of the active immune therapy.
The risks of active immune therapy led to the development of passive immune therapy with immune globulins (IVIG).
This therapy, however, is relatively expensive and obviously no more successful than the active immune therapy.
In a metaanalysis of all published results, IVIG was not significantly more effective than treatment with placebo.
The indication for both forms of immune therapy is given after 3 or more consecutive abortions, after exclusion of other reasons for these abortions.
It appears that only primary aborting patients are suitable for active immune therapy.
Athough the concept of immune therapy is still under debate, alternative concepts are not available.
Hence, new therapeutic approaches are also not available.
The first electronic implantable hearing aids for patients with hearing loss are coupled to the ossicular chain or perilymph during implantation and are now available.
Our new Tübingen implant designed for sensorineural hearing loss (SNHL) is the combination of an implantable microphone and piezotransducer.
To avoid hearing losses during implantation, the Tübingen piezotransducer will be (1) fixed to the mastoid cavity and (2) positioned to one of the ossicular target points.
This can be done with a micromanipulator which will be implanted together with transducer and microphone in the mastoid cavity.
The manipulator weights 0.7 g. With four degrees of freedom, it allows highly secure and safe positioning of the transducer's probe tip to the ossicular chain under close to stereotactic conditions.
The main advantages of the present micromanipulator are (1) easy handling during surgery, (2) the transducer's precise positioning to the ossicular target point with sufficient degrees of freedom, and (3) the transducer's stable fixation in the mastoid cavity in the final position.
Following integrated safety as the leading principle, ossicular or inner ear injuries caused, e.g., by the patient's head movement or unintentional manual contact by the surgeon, are minimized.
The micromanipulator is, as it were, the surgeon's vibration-free "artificial hand".
The manipulator's development and its optimization to the mastoid cavity by test implantation in 50 human temporal bones are shown in detail.
While coupling the transducer to the body of the incus, transducer, microphone, and micromanipulator can be implanted into 76% of all mastoid cavities without protrusion.
In the case of transducers coupling to the long process of the incus, the protrusion-free implantation rate of the above-mentioned three implant modules is 78%.
The role of neuroimaging in the acute setting of head trauma is to diagnose the extent of intracranial injury and to identify all lesions which require urgent neurosurgical treatment.
Computed tomography (CT) remains the most important diagnostic tool for initial screening of trauma victims.
Although magnetic resonance imaging (MR) has higher sensitivity to most traumatic lesions than CT, due to the ease and speed of CT, and the fact that sufficient monitoring of critically ill patients during the examination is much easier with CT than with MR, mean that MR is not the imaging modality of choice for the initial diagnostic work-up.
Recent MR techniques such as FLAIR or diffusion imaging further improve the sensitivity of MR in head trauma.
Conventional angiography is currently indicated only for few suspected vascular lesions (e.g.
traumatic arterio-venous fistulas, vascular dissections).
Injuries to the posterior cruciate ligament are among the major injuries to the knee joint.
Today we are often confronted with an inapproprate and delayed diagnosis of this injury and its concomitant lesions.
Additionally, the outcome of operative treatment has not yet reached an acceptable rate of satisfactory results.
Therefore, the goal of this current concept review is to give a comprehensive insight into anatomy and biomechanics, injury mechanisms and pathobiomechanics, based on our experiences and data from the international literature.
A further goal is to clarify diagnostic problems with respect to clinical examination and imaging techniques.
We also present a differential concept for the perioperative and conservative management of posterior cruciate ligament deficient knees in order to also adequately address concomitant injuries such as posterolateral rotatory instability and combined anterior cruciate ligament injuries with the aim of further improving results.
Sevoflurane, like all currently used volatile anaesthetics, is degraded by carbon dioxide absorbents.
The most significant degradant is a haloalkene known trivially as "compound A".
Compound A is nephrotoxic in rats and, at higher doses, in nonhuman primates, causing proximal tubular necrosis.
There has been much interest in the potential for compound A toxicity in humans.
Inhaled compound A concentrations are greatest at low flow rates, high sevoflurane concentrations, warmer absorbent, barium hydroxide vs soda lime, and drier absorbent.
Typical inspired compound A concentrations during low-flow and closed-circuit sevoflurane anaesthesia in humans are 8-24 and 20-32 ppm with soda lime and barium hydroxide lime, respectively.
Renal effects of compound A production during sevoflurane anesthesia have been examined in surgical patients and volunteers, using standard (creatinine clearance, serum BUN and creatinine) and experimental (urine excretion of protein, glucose, NAG, GST, AAP) markers of renal function.
Investigations to date in surgical patients show similar renal effects of low-flow sevoflurane, low-flow isoflurane or high-flow sevoflurane.
There have been no case reports of compound A-associated renal injury in humans.
In volunteers, one study found changes in experimental but not conventional renal markers, while other investigations show no significant changes in either standard or experimental markers.
The mechanism of compound A nephrotoxicity in rats appears to involve metabolism to glutathione and cysteine conjugates, and their subsequent renal uptake and metabolism by pathways that are different in rats and humans.
In the report of the 1995 World Health Federation/International Society and Federation of Cardiology (WHF/ISFC) Task Force on the Definition and Classification of Cardiomyopathies, the definition of heart muscle diseases was updated.
Idiopathic, autoimmune, and infectious forms of inflammatory cardiomyopathy are now recognized in this definition.
Enteroviruses, adenoviruses and cytomegaloviruses are considered as main etiopathological factors in the pathogenesis of inflammatory heart disease.
We report our experience in managing a temporal bone fracture after head trauma that had no apparent clinical signs.
Recurrent CSF rhinorrhea and meningitis lead to extensive diagnostic procedures.
Operative exploration of the temporal bone demonstrated a fracture line along the horizontal part of the carotid artery.
The location of the fracture did not cause such typical symptoms as hearing impairment, facial paralysis, vertigo or tinnitus.
Only CSF liquorrhea through the Eustachian tube indicated a fracture at the lateral skull base.
Hyperkeratosis lenticularis perstans (Flegel's disease) is a rare but clinically and histologically highly characteristic genodermatosis.
We report on new immunohistochemical and ultrastructural findings suggesting a complex disorder of epidermal differentiation.
In this context, a good response to calcipotriol, a synthetic vitamin D3 derivative is of particular interest.
Pulmonary embolism is a frequent and potentially life-threatening event with uncharacteristic clinical manifestations.
Diagnosis is commonly established by ventilation/perfusion scintigraphy and pulmonary angiography.
Both methods, however, carry substantial drawbacks.
Therefore, clinicians claim that there is a need for an accurate and non-invasive diagnostic modality.
Spiral CT of the pulmonary arteries is a recent modality, that allows reliable visualization of emboli in pulmonary arteries up to fourth-order branches.
This paper reviews the technical aspects, typical findings and diagnostic pitfalls of this recent technique.
The potential role of spiral CT in the screening of patients with suspected pulmonary embolism is discussed and selected cases are presented.
Introduction: Interleukin-12-p70 (IL-12-p70) is a potent immunoregulatory cytokine composed of a heavy chain (p40) and a light chain (p35).
Contradicting results have been reported with regard to leukocyte release and systemic concentration of IL-12 after polytrauma.
Methods: We daily analyzed systemic concentrations of IL-12 in polytrauma patients (n = 37, mean ISS 33.9) in comparison to healthy donor values during intensive care course by ELISA.
Patients were divided according to their mean IL-12 levels into those with elevated IL-12 (group 1, n = 7), those with decreased IL-12 (group 2, n = 4) and those with IL-12 in the normal range (group 3, n = 26).
Results: Patients in group 1 revealed elevated levels of IL-12 up to p70 > 1000 pg/ml and p40 > 2500 pg/ml.
The common clinical feature of group 1 was a thorax trauma in combination with pneumonia (85 % survivors).
Patients with single thorax trauma or pneumonia without thorax trauma (group 3) showed normal IL-12 values.
Patients with decreased IL-12 levels revealed also a thorax trauma and pneumonia but all patients succumbed.
The groups significantly differ in their stay in the intensive care unit, in TISS, in MODS score and in respiratory ratio, but not in ISS, mean CRP values and leukocyte counts.
Correlation analysis revealed no significant relation between systemically altered IL-12 values and clinical parameters, with the exception of a negative correlation of p70 and ISS (r = -0.785) or MODS score (r = -0.314) in group 1.
Conclusions: After major injuries there is no overall suppression of IL-12 formation.
Patients with normal or elevated IL-12 levels belong mainly to the survivors, whereas patients with decreased IL-12 levels are at high risk of succumbing to multi-organ failure.
This article reviews the pathogenesis and clinical and imaging findings in shoulder impingement syndrome.
Shoulder impingement is caused by compression of the supraspinatus tendon underneath the coracoacromial arch, mainly in forward flexion of the arm.
Different stages of impingement syndrome are described.
Stage I relates to edema and hemorrhage of the supraspinatus tendon.
Stage II is characterized by bursal inflammation and fibrosis, as well as tendinopathy.
In stage III there is a tear of the rotator cuff.
Moreover, calcifying tendinitis, fractures and pain originating from the cervical spine may mimic shoulder impingement syndrome.
Imaging is important for the exact diagnosis.
Standard radiographs are the basis of imaging in shoulder impingement syndrome.
They may demonstrate subchondral sclerosis of the major tuberosity, subacromial spurs, and form anomalies of the acromion.
They are also important in the differential diagnosis of shoulder impingement syndrome and demonstrate calcifying tendinitis, fractures and neoplasm.
Ultrasonography has found acceptance as a screening tool and even as a final diagnostic method by many authors.
However, there is a high interobserver variability in the demonstration of rotator cuff tears.
Its usefulness has therefore been questioned.
MR imaging is probably the method of choice in the evaluation of the rotator cuff and surrounding structures.
Several investigations have demonstrated that differentiation of early findings, such as tendinopathy versus partial tears, may be difficult with MR imaging.
However, reproducibility for full-thickness tears appears to be higher than for sonography.
Moreover, specificity appears to be superior to sonography.
MR arthrography is not universally accepted.
However, it allows for more exact differentiation of discrete findings and may be indicated in preoperative planning.
Standard arthrography and CT have a limited role in the current assessment of the rotator cuff.
Gastric carcinoma of the infiltrative type (according to Ming) occasionally shows adenomatous differentiation only.
Over the past 18 years, we have observed 23 cases of this tumour type, accounting for 3.6 % of all surgically treated gastric carcinomas.
Macroscopically they were classified as Borrmann IV or III, while histologically most of them were well differentiated.
Histologically, these tumours retained the pre-existing structures of the stomach, most readily observable at the tunica muscularis propria; a pronounced desmoplasia was also characteristic, particularly in the submucosal and subserosal layers.
In all cases the tumour tissue spread inside lymphatic vessels.
All but 2 cases with metastatically involved lymph nodes, often small, showed infiltration of the lymph node sinus; in three quarters of cases the serosa was infiltrated by the tumour.
Significant findings among the patients under observation for extended periods included bilateral ovarian metastases in 4 of 5 women examined and tumour recurrence at the anastomosis in 6 of 9 patients in whom Billroth II operation had been performed.
The mean survival time of 16 patients was 14.9 months.
Owing to the diffuse type of tumour growth, extensive surgery is recommended as in cases of signet ring cell cancer.
The high incidence of small lymph node metastases from this type of tumour should also be taken in account at preoperative staging.
Preoperative diagnosis of this tumour subtype is difficult, because histological criteria alone do not allow clear identification.
Close cooperation with clinical investigators is necessary, and intraoperative assessment of the tumour - including frozen section of necessary - in particular is of the outmost importance.
One rare case of so-called massive idiopathic osteolysis Gorham-Stout is presented.
In a 77-year-old female patient the whole right femoral head and neck of femur was resorbed within 2.5 month following trauma.
As a histologic cause for the osteolysis, a marked stimulation of osteoclasts on the spongiosa, especially intracortically, was observed.
The course and the clinical findings are described, and the pathogenesis and treatment are discussed in comparison with the present literature.
The results suggest that an early antiresorptive therapy (calcitonin, bisphosphonates) could stop the progressive osteolytic changes.
In this paper the relationship between psychodiagnosis and client-centered therapy is discussed.
Rogers is wrongly said to have rejected any kind of diagnosis and that this therapy form has therefore developed an ambiguous relationship to this issue.
If one sees psychodiagnosis as something psychodynamic, and symptoms as defense strategies against underlying conflicts, then a comprehensive 'status diagnosis' using more or less traditional psychiatric categories appears compatible with theory-led client-centered diagnosis in the initial phase and during the course of therapy.
Client-centered psychotherapy itself may be seen as a continuous process of dialogue in which 'assumed diagnoses' (embedded in the therapist's 'empathic knowledge') are jointly checked and in which the client through direct experience learns to understand and change his 'diagnosis'.
In the examination of reversible segmental (articular) hypomobile dysfunction (blockage) of the spine, we have to recognize by palpation the feeling of beginning resistance at the end of the passive movement ("barrier").
This is the main finding to diagnose segmental (articular) dysfunction.
Normal mobility gives us a slowly increasing resistance with possible springing at the end.
In contrary, the sudden feeling of hard tension without springing is seen as typical for the restricted movement in articular dysfunction, i. e. restriction of joint facet gliding.
Multiple intra- and paraglandular lymph nodes develop in the parotid gland, including salivary gland tissue with acinar and ductal formations.
In the same way heterotopic salivary gland tissue can be localized in cervical lymph nodes.
Except for the frequently occurring Warthin tumours, primary salivary gland tumours, which develop in the lymph nodes of the parotid gland or the cervical lymph nodes, are rare.
Examples of these are adenomas (pleomorphic adenoma, basal cell adenoma) and carcinomas (acinic cell carcinoma, mucoepidermoid carcinoma, sebaceous gland carcinoma).
Three of our own observations (sebaceous lymphadenoma, acinic cell carcinoma, mucoepidermoid carcinoma) are analysed.
The condition for the diagnosis of primary salivary gland tumour within a lymph node is reliable evidence that the salivary gland tissue is tumour-free and that no other occult carcinoma is present.
We report on a three month old infant presenting with vaginal bleeding.
Precocious pseudopuberty due to an autonomous ovarian cyst was diagnosed.
Within three months the follicular cyst spontaneously regressed.
Elevated estradiol levels also decreased spontaneously.
The purpose of this study was to determine whether 24 hour patch testing with 0.5% sodium lauryl sulphate (SLS) could reliably predict skin susceptibility to an irritant when compared with the alkali resistance test (ART), a widely used method employing sodium hydroxide.
After having given informed consent, 40 patients (age range from 20 to 60 years) with an active irritant contact dermatitis (ICD), 40 patients in whom ICD had cleared, as well as 40 healthy volunteers serving as controls were tested.
The skin responses to SLS were assessed both visually and by measurement of transepidermal water loss (TEWL) as an indicator of stratum corneum integrity.
SLS significantly increased the erythema scores and TEWL in patients with healed ICD, and the increase of TEWL was even more pronounced in patients with active ICD.
By contrast, a decrease in alkali resistance was found in patients with active ICD only but not in patients with healed ICD.
The data obtained indicate that the SLS test, unlike ART, may provide a non-invasive tool predicting a possible constitutional skin susceptibility or indicating a subclinically impaired epidermal barrier function.
However, because of the relatively high interindividual variation, a cut-clear statement concerning the skin susceptibility cannot be made by this test.
On the other hand, the ART seems only to be useful for following and documenting the healing period following ICD.
Introduction: The correction of low to moderate astigmatism is possible today by means of photoablation (PRK), while the treatment of moderate and higher astigmatism still involves refractive keratotomy.
Experience has shown that cataract surgery, using modern tunnel techniques with self-healing incisions, results in earlier stability in both the refractive outcome and wound healing.
In this study, we attempted to combine the advantages of lamellar keratotomy with those of a pair-wise T-incision as arcuate lamellar keratotomy (ALK).
An often unrecognized but potentially fatal complication, mostly seen in posttraumatic patients under intensive care, is reactive acute cholecystitis.
On account of the high specificity of ultrasound diagnosis in the biliary system we decided to examine the ultrasound criteria for early detection of posttraumatic cholecystitis.
Ultrasound of the abdomen was performed prospectively, seven times on different days, in each of 40 artificially respirated patients under intensive care conditions over a period of 12 months.
The results show that artificial respiration, parenteral feeding and previous trauma can lead to tardive (28/40) wallthickening or to a three-layered wall of the gallbladder (9/40).
In 22.5 % of patients (9/40) we found the sonographic signs of acute cholecystitis.
In correlation with the clinical signs, cholecystectomy was indicated in only two patients.
The preoperative ultrasonographic findings and clinical signs of 23 patients with the diagnosis of acute reactive cholecystitis were analysed retrospectively.
We found good correlation between sonographic and clinical signs of acute cholecystitis in 21 of these 23 patients.
Our study shows that the morphological correlate of a thickened three-layered gallbladder wall can occur in the context of systemic alterations, even if there is no underlying cholecystitis.
The diagnosis of acute reactive cholecystitis and the indication for cholecystectomy should be based on the synopsis of pathologic and clinical findings.
Osteoporosis is characterized by reduced bone mass and a deterioration of bone structure which results in an increased fracture risk.
The purpose of this review is to evaluate structure analysis techniques in the diagnosis of osteoporosis.
Several imaging techniques were applied to analyze trabecular bone, such as conventional radiography, high-resolution computed tomography (HR-CT) and high-resolution magnetic resonance imaging (HR-MRI).
The best results were obtained using high-resolution tomographic techniques.
The highest spatial resolutions in vivo were achieved using HR-MRI.
These studies show that texture parameters and bone mineral density predict bone strength and osteoporotic fractures in a complementary fashion.
Combining both techniques yields the best results in the diagnosis of osteoporosis.
Classification of cosmetics, which are more and more similar to topical therapeutic agents, is getting increasingly difficult for dermatologists.
Their definition within the EU and the respective European directives, replacing national laws step by step, will be briefly presented.
The problems of distinguishing cosmetics from medicinal products will be discusssed in detail by examples from clinical practice.
Finally, we will review the various active substances which tend to be added to cosmetics following the global trend in the cosmetic industry towards developing "medicinally" active cosmetics, and in the pharmaceutical industry towards "cosmetically" oriented medicinal products as part of a current "life-style" ideology.
In some clinical dermatological fields these active substances may allow the dermatologists to use cosmetics as topical therapeutic agents.
The decision whether a rotator cuff tear has a traumatic or degenerative origin still causes some controversy.
Especially in medical expert appraisements the etiology of the rotator cuff tear plays an important role refering to insurance services for the patient.
The purpose of this paper is to compare the intraoperative pathomorphologic shape of the cuff tear in traumatic and degenerative cases.
This study reports of 56 patients with rotator cuff tears which were devided in primarily acute, subacute traumatic and degenerative study groups refering to their history of present illness.
We considered the location of the tear, the shape and the size.
Furthermore the grade of retraction of the supraspinatus tendon, its quality and the shape of the long head of biceps were examined.
The results showed that in general the shape of the tear gives only in some cases significant information whether the etiology is traumatic or not.
The isolated rupture of the subscapularis muscle and the hematoma at the edge of the tendon is siginificant for the trauma.
In comparison with the degenerative study group the tenosynovitis and the dislocation of the long head of biceps is in our study sigificant for traumatic tears.
Health care decision making in incompetent severely ill patients presents many difficult medical, ethical, and legal problems for the physician.
At the same time nurses represent the group of medical professionals who have the closest contact with the patient and who have to carry out most of the decisions and instructions.
Barber's disease is produced by short hairs that penetrate the interdigital spaces of the hands.
The following chronic inflammatory reaction causes fistulas or sinuses and cysts.
We present the case of a patient with interdigital pilonidal sinuses of all web spaces in both hands.
Such an extensive case of this occupational disease has so far not been reported.
The treatment of critically ill patients compromises frequently between an adequate fluid resuscitation for maintenance of a sufficient regional perfusion on the one hand and the avoidance of pulmonary edema on the other hand.
The application of the transpulmonary indicator dilution method allows the orientation of fluid therapy by using the parameters 'intrathoracic blood volume' and 'extravascular lung water'.
This technique is less invasive than the pulmonary artery catheter since it only needs a 3 or 4 French catheter in the femoral artery.
Additionally, controlling the fluid therapy with the pulmonary capillary wedge pressure is severely limited in the mechanically ventilated patient.
Therefore, the intrathoracic blood volume may be of advantage in the critically care patient in comparison to the pulmonary capillary wedge pressure to assess the cardiac preload.
Furthermore, the indocyanine clearance adds a valuable parameter to assess liver function when the double indicator technique is used.
Hypnosis, autogenic training, progressive relaxation and biofeedback show good empirical evidence concerning relaxation-therapy and are useful techniques in psycho- or behavior-therapy.
Though they share some aspects with body-oriented psychotherapy these relaxation-techniques show a modern scientific orientation and are therefore to seperate from religious meditation.
Though in details somewhat different, the methodology of these techniques creates a framework, in which the psychophysiological determined relaxation response is easily elicited.
However, regular practice of the patients is requiered.
Focussed attention, imagination and new attributions of bodily or mental perceptions play a dominant role concerning the therapeutic effects, which may contribute to enhanced internal selfcontrol and selfesteem.
Controlled clinical studies give evidence to positive effects concerning various psychosomatic disorders (e.g.
headache, pain, ess.
hypertension), as well as anxiety and sleeping disorders.
As components of psychotherapeutic or behavioral programs, there is even more evidence for effects of relaxation in a broad spectrum of disorders (e.g.
Relaxation therapy is a well established and scientific-based component in the treatment of psychic, psychosomatic or psychiatric disorders, except psychosis.
Juvenile hyaline fibromatosis is a rare autosomal recessive connective tissue disease first described in 1873 by Murray.
Major diagnostic criteria are multiple cutaneous tumors and gingival hypertrophy; minor criteria include contractures, osteolytic lesions and a positive family history.
A 35-year-old woman suffering from Crohn's disease for 3 years developed painful erythematous nodular lesions predominantly on the dorsa of her hands and feet, as well as on her elbows and wrists.
The clinical features and histopathological picture of leukocytoclastic vasculitis were both highly suggestive of erythema elevatum diutinum.
No improvement of the skin lesions was observed during treatment with high doses of oral steroids.
In contrast, treatment with dapsone resulted in a marked reduction of skin lesions.
During a new attack of her Crohn's disease the erythema elevatum diutinum lesions flared again.
The parallel clinical course of erythema elevatum diutinum and Crohn's disease, as well as the detection of immune complexes and neutrophilic granulocytes in lesions of both diseases, strongly suggest a common etiology.
This hypothesis is discussed in context with this case and the recent literature.
The mammalian brain is capable of a substantial functional reorganization, manifesting on a cortical somatotopical and on a behavioral level.
Possible mechanisms are reviewed based on the work by others and ourselves on somatosensory reorganization in humans.
The somatosensory system is characterized by divergent projections from the periphery to the cerebral cortex.
Changes in synaptic weights allow for reorganization of sensory processing: On one side, limb amputation will result in a representational "invasion" of the deafferentated cortex from neighboring regions with concomitant perceptual changes.
On the other side, sensorimotor training can increase the representational cortical zone of a limb.
Plastic changes can be temporary or persistent.
Modulating factors like pain and certain drugs seem to induce a permissive state in the cortex resulting in enhanced reorganization.
Thus, specific physical training combined with pharmacoceutical modulation holds promise to improve functional recovery after brain lesions.
There have been some prospective randomized studies which compared primary angioplasty with intravenous thrombolysis in patients with an acute myocardial infarction (AMI).
However, a substantial number of patients with AMI who would not have been included in those trials are treated with one of these two therapeutic options.
To describe the proportions, characteristics, and outcome of these patients treated with primary angioplasty or thrombolysis we analyzed the data of the prospective "Maximal Individual Optimized Therapy for Acute Myocardial Infarction" (MITRA) trial.
Chronic infectious diseases may run over many months and years, accompanied by only mild clinical signs and often without organ-specific symptoms.
People with any kind of immuno deficiency are more frequently affected by chronic infections.
History, physical examination, laboratory tests, microbiological tests and imaging methods may lead to an exact diagnosis.
The most important differential diagnosis are autoimmune diseases, amyloidosis and malignant lymphoma.
Background: We perform partial sphincterectomy during cataract surgery in cases with very small pupil (< 3 mm).
We assume that the small pupil is mainly due to a fibrosis ring of the sphincter muscle.
Trauma scores in emergency medicine quantitatively characterise the severity of trauma victims' injuries and physiologic derangements.
They are used to detect and assess patients and have applications in guiding patient care and early therapeutic decisions.
In the pre-clinical setting, an effective trauma index meets the following criteria: - It is highly reliable with regard to identifying high- and low-risk patients.
- It has high face-validity.
- It has high inter- and intra-rater reliability.
- It is easy to use and allows rapid, accurate measurements.
The most widely accepted injury severity index is probably the Injury Severity Score (ISS).
It is calculated as the sum of the squares of the three most severely injured body regions, and was originally developed as a means to standardise the description of injuries sustained in motor vehicle accidents.
The Trauma Score (TS) represents the gold standard of physiologic scoring of injury severity.
It summarises the numerical assessments of the central nervous and cardiopulmonary system functions.
The recently developed Mainz Emergency Evaluation Score (MEES) is based upon numerical specification of the vital signs, including a pain scale, and has been designed as a dynamic score.
Nevertheless, limitations of the established trauma score systems have been described.
Mortality and patient outcome do not strictly correlate with injury severity scoring.
In addition, intubated or paralysed patients were excluded from outcome studies since the scoring systems lacked options for evaluation of pathophysiological conditions after therapeutic interventions.
Thus, therapeutic efficacy could hardly be assessed, and subsequent scoring during time periods was impossible.
The accurate definition of comprehensive evaluation of a trauma victim is challenging, for example, "pain" as chosen in the MEES must be regarded as a highly desirable piece of information although its rating may prove difficult, especially when classifying unconscious patients.
Further criticisms of the above-mentioned trauma indices could include omission of the trauma victim's age, gender, pre-injury health status, or the influence of alcohol or additional medication.
Moreover, questioning the interrater reliability of injury severity scoring, a recent study revealed bias in assigning values to trauma patients: trained raters classified injury severity with significantly higher indices than less experienced researchers.
If trauma indices in pre-hospital emergency medicine were relied upon as the only means of evaluating a trauma patient and guiding therapeutic approaches, significant numbers of trauma victims requiring major interventions would be missed.
Resuscitative treatment regimens must not be based solely upon indices, since, e.g., in states of shock injury scores do not correlate with fluid resuscitative requirements.
Furthermore, a qualitative assignment of single vital-function parameters as crucial indices for a patient's condition never reflects the broad range of a patient's profile.
Many multiple-trauma patients do benefit from controlled ventilation in clinical experience even though pulse oximetry values are within the physiological range, and the administration of analgesics or even pre-hospital anaesthesia has often proved advantageous for trauma patients in the field.
Providing the opportunity of subsequent patient evaluation and the efficacy of acute care, the MEES has been developed as a dynamic scoring system.
This design is extremely desirable and must be regarded as an indispensible criterion for future scoring systems.
In view of the peculiarities of field emergency medicine, pre-hospital indices do have limitations.
The parameters "unknown patient", time pressure, unprecise measurements, lack of diagnostic facilities, incomplete evaluation, and limited statistical power cannot be eliminated.
Accurate prediction of outcome within early time-frames is therefore not possible.
Ossification of the Achilles tendon is the result of a traumatic, hypoxic injury of the tendon.
The usually asymptomatic ossification has a clinical importance only in case of a new trauma.
We report about a patient with an isolated fracture of the ossification without an accompanying rupture of the Achilles tendon.
Because of the radiologically "occult" fracture the diagnosis could only be verified by MRI.
With a conservative treatment without resection of the ossification we could reach painless recovery.
Hair problems are attacked at the levels of information supply, trichological competence and evidence based medical treatment.
The alopecias represent a major health care challenge, and the psychological significance of hair loss has only recently found appreciation in the medical community.
They may pose a vexing problem for non-specialized physicians, who tend to trivialize such complaints, although the patient's perception of abnormality determines whether or not advice is sought.
Perception of a hair problem is subject to sociocultural standards; films and advertisements help determine the threshold for "normality" and what is "healthy" and "beautiful", and the media provide an abundance of undiscriminating information with respect to hair care.
Patients with hair problems frequently consult the hairdresser prior to the medical specialist.
Thus additional areas of competence should be incorporated into the hairdresser's training qualifications.
Besides manual, creative and psychological aptitudes, "trichological competence" relating to the recognition of most important hair disorders, recognition of personal limitations and cooperation with the medical specialist are required.
To optimize the interaction between the physician, hairdressers and the media, more effective communication and public activities from the medical profession are desirable, with success depending on full identification of the set goals, qualification and adherance to the standards determined by the medical speciality.
We reexamined biopsy and resection specimens from seven patients with histologically established primary diagnosis of small-cell lung cancer (SCLC) which showed previously undetected adenocarcinomatous differentiation after chemotherapy.
Adenocarcinoma was diagnosed in the same part of the lung as was SCLC before treatment in five cases and in contralateral location in two.
Two tumors showed heterogeneous differentiation with small-cell and adenocarcinomatous components, and five had only adenocarcinoma.
The interval between histological evidence of SCLC and adenocarcinoma was 3 months-5 years.
From the specific findings in the respective patients we can offer two possible explanations for changing differentiation in SCLC after chemotherapy: (a) a primarily heterogeneously differentiated tumor with selection of adenocarcinomatous component under chemotherapy, and (b) an independently developed adenocarcinoma after successful chemotherapy of SCLC, as patients with treated SCLC are known to have an increased risk of non-SCLC.
However, therapy-induced alteration of differentiation seems much more unlikely.
These findings should be considered in diagnosis and therapy of SCLC to allow early and appropriate reaction to non-SCLC components.
Demonstration of BDV-specific serum antibodies, the isolation of BDV from cerebrospinal fluid of neuropsychiatric patients, and the recent demonstration of BDV antigen and BDV-RNA in human brain tissue strongly suggest that BDV can infect humans.
Isolation of BD virus from brain tissue is needed for final proof.
There is still great controversy about the question of whether BDV antigen, BDV-RNA or BDV can be detected in peripheral blood monocytes or not.
Overall, the question of pathogenicity of BDV infection for humans is wide open.
Investigations of human cerebrospinal fluid indicate that BDV might cause human lymphocytic meningoencephalitis and so-called symptomatic psychoses in rare cases.
Seroepidemiological studies suggest a widely non-specific but possibly pathogenic role of BDV in a spectrum of psychiatric disorders.
In a controlled prospective study we compared the efficacy of combined salt water bath and UVA/B phototherapy to a UVA/B mono-phototherapy in patients with subacute atopic dermatitis (AD).
The patients in the balneophototherapy group (n=16) were treated with baths containing 3-5% of the synthetic salt Psori-sal, followed immediately by UVA/B irradiation, while the other treatment arm (n=12) received UVA/B phototherapy alone.
After 20 treatments the balneophototherapy group showed a statistically significant (p<=0.0015) reduction of the SCORAD score from 69.5 before to 36.8 after therapy.
No statistically significant reduction in the SCORAD score could be observed in the UVA/B phototherapy group (50.6 before to 44.3 after therapy).
The cumulative UVB dose was significantly lower in the balneophototherapy group (0.9 J/cm2) as compared to the UVA/B monotherapy group (2.0 J/cm2).
Balneophototherapy was well tolerated by patients with atopic dermatitis and no side effects were observed.
We conclude that balneophototherapy expands the therapeutic options for patients with subacute atopic dermatitis.
Five percent of all human tumors are found in the head and neck region with an increasing rate.
Head and neck tumors are not only a significant problem because of the large number of people affected.
The functional and cosmetic disadvantages and stigmas related to the therapy influence the medical recommendations for each individual patient.
Background and purpose: Only a few clinical reports about the routine use of intravenous rt-PA for the treatment of acute ischemic stroke have been published.
Wether the perfusion of the extracranial parts of the internal carotid artery influences the outcome of the patients is still unknown, because the two major studies about systemic thrombolytic therapy with rt-PA in stroke (ECASS and NINDS) did not formally assess the status of the extracranial vessels.
Introduction: Chronic pain is an individually variable experience, incorporating physical, psychological and social dimensions.
Chronic pain occurs in a broad spectrum of severity; therefore, a grading procedure is of crucial importance in clinical research and in epidemiologic studies.
It is mandatory to differentiate between traumatic and atraumatic instability when treating shoulder instability.
The traumatic instability is characterized by secondary lesions (Bankart lesion, Hill-Sachs lesion, overstretching of the capsule), which are caused at the time of primary dislocation.
The quality of the capsule has to be considered in close relationship to the appearance of the Bankart lesion.
The stronger the capsule, the greater the external force has to be in order to surmount the resistance caused by the capsule.
The damage to the glenoid rim makes it possible to draw conclusions about the condition of the capsule.
In cases of atraumatic instability, secondary lesions are normally absent.
These instabilities are often caused by laxity of the capsule.
When stabilizing, a shoulder two criteria have to be taken into consideration: stability and function.
Reattachment of the labrum alone will not guarantee stability.
Additionally, the overstretched capsule has to be shortened or shifted.
Both criteria are decisive for the success of the stabilizing operation.
In benign goiter, thyroidectomy is only indicated in patients with nodular alterations of the complete thyroid gland.
There is no evidence indicating that total thyroidectomy could improve the postoperative results in patients with Graves' disease.
In Germany, thyroidectomy with cervicocentral lymph node dissection is the standard procedure for all differentiated thyroid carcinomas.
However, there are no data to prove that this approach is superior to less radical procedures.
Avoidance of reoperations and optimal conditions for effective postoperative radioiodine therapy are arguments for this aggressive strategy.
In patients with medullary carcinoma or with detected ret-proto-oncogene mutations, thyroidectomy with cervicocentral lymphadenectomy should be the initial operation.
The cervicolateral and mediastinal compartments should be dissected when clinically obvious lymph node metastases are present in patients with differentiated carcinomas.
In patients with medullary carcinomas, persistently increased calcitonin levels after the initial operation are sufficient indication for this procedure.
Thyroidectomy is an important part of the multimodal approach in patients with anaplastic carcinomas.
The operative technique of thyroidectomy is presented as well as the technique of cervical lymphadenectomy in consideration of the lymphatic drainage of the thyroid gland.
Tyrosinemia type I is an autosomal recessively inherited deficiency of fumarylacetoacetate hydrolase resulting in accumulation of tyrosin and its degradation products (succinylacetoacetone mainly).
Typical clinical features include liver and kidney failure as well as central nervous system involvement.
There are three main forms of the disease: the acute form with manifestation in newborn infants and the subacute and the chronic form in children older than one year of age.
Experimental data and clinical as well as postmortem experiences have indicated that subdural hematomas are less frequent in acceleration injuries in traffic accidents compared to falls or assaults.
The present report demonstrates that this does not hold true in the same way for bridging vein ruptures (one of the predominant causes for subdural bleedings).
Ruptures of these vessels without subdural bleeding (SDB) are only seldom mentioned in the literature.
However, if no SDB is present, no one will look for these structures.
In our institute a systematic analysis of the bridging veins in all cases of lethal blunt head injury is made: prior to the careful morphological preparation we investigate these vessels by radiographic imaging after filling with contrast medium.
6 car passengers (age between 4 and 31 years) which suffered a lethal head injury were examined in the last year.
2 victims had impressed fractures with cerebral compression injuries.
In 1 case the base of the skull was broken and in 3 cases no skull fracture was present; no serious focal brain injury had occured in these 4 cases, but 3 victims had signs of diffuse brain injury.
In 5 cases a direct impact of the head against the interior of the car was obvious.
In 5 cases ruptures of serveral bridging veins could be demonstrated.
In one case (survival for 3 days) a minor SDB (20 ml) was present and the ruptures had been closed by thrombosis; another victim died at the scene.
The other 3 victims survived between 4 and 15 hours without developing SDB and without closing of the ruptures by thrombosis.
This combination is surprising and shows that our knowledge concerning the relationship between bridging vein ruptures and SDB is restrictred.
The frequency of bridging vein lesions in severe head injuries is likely underestimated in the clinical as well as in the postmortem literature.
A rapid increase of intracranial pressure after the accident resulting in a collapse of the cerebral circulation is probably responsible for the absence of the SDB in the presented cases.
Implantable hearing aids can form the basis of new surgical techniques for dealing with hearing problems originating in the inner ear, provided they are fully implantable.
Accordingly, a comprehensive, interdisciplinary, combined project was initiated at the ENT clinic of the University of Tübingen which was to conclude with operations to improve hearing via fully implantable hearing aids.
A novel electromechanical transducer for implantable hearing aids based on the piezoelectric principle is described.
Unlike the piezoelectric transducers reported so far, this transducer does not rely on the bimorphic principle but on a circle-shaped, heteromorphic combination system consisting of a piezoceramic disc and metal membrane.
The transducer can be hermetically sealed and is designed for implantation into the mastoid.
Transfer of mechanical oscillations to an ossicle in the middle ear is effected by a directly fixed coupling rod or via suitable coupling elements.
The transducer is highly tuned with a resonance frequency at the upper end of the spectral transfer range (greater than 10 kHz).
Below this resonance and down to low frequencies, the frequency response of elongation is smooth with amplitudes of around 20 nm.
At low and middle frequencies of up to 1 kHz, these vibration amplitudes correspond to sound-pressure levels of around 90 dB SPL.
At higher frequencies of up to 10 kHz, the output level increases to about 130 dB SPL.
Nonlinear distortions are also very small at the highest levels (less than 0.1%) throughout the whole transfer range.
Electric power consumption at maximum levels is in the range of a few microwatts and is therefore significantly lower than that of electromagnetic systems.
Particularly, this makes it possible to use the transducer in fully implantable hearing aids for rehabilitation of sensorineural hearing loss.
In craniomaxillofacial traumatology, surgical oncology and craniomaxillofacial reconstruction, a surgeon's aim may interfere with the prechiasmatic visual pathway.
Precise concepts and therapeutic strategies are mandatory to detect and deal with anterior visual pathway disorders.
In order to develop these strategies, knowledge of the pathomechanisms of potential optic nerve trauma, primary radiological investigations, and further diagnostic measures are important.
Due to the difficulties in neuroophthalmological testing of visual pathway functioning in severely injured patients or even during craniomaxillofacial reconstructions, we established flash-evoked visual potentials (VEP) and the electroretinogram (ERG) as reliable electrophysiological methods to gather specific information as to whether the visual pathway function is intact, even if pathological, but still present or absent.
Case reports show that subjectively or objectively confirmed unilateral amaurosis does not neccessarily mean irreversible vision loss.
The electrophysiological evaluation together with multiplanar computer tomography (CT) are important for the immediate identification of optic nerve trauma.
The results of this evaluation will provide the diagnostic information on whether surgical intervention and/or conservative therapy is required to prevent secondary optic nerve damage.
The conservative therapy of choice for the treatment of traumatic optic nerve lesions is the methylprednisolone-megadosis regimen (30 mg Urbason/kg bodyweight i.v.
and 5.4 mg/kg bodyweight/h i.v.
for the following 47 h).
Surgical therapy involves decompression of the orbital compartment in case of retrobulbar hematoma or decompression of the intracanalicular part of the optic nerve in the traumatized optic canal or posterior orbit as confirmed by CT.
Prospective analysis of our trauma patients and the international literature on traumatic optic nerve lesions show that the time factor in when to start therapy has been greatly underestimated.
To fulfill modern treatment concepts in craniomaxillofacial surgery, sound diagnostic and therapeutic knowledge on the maintenance of visual pathway function is required.
In the presence of preterm labor, premature rupture of the membranes, and preterm maturation of the cervix, there is an increased risk for premature birth.
There is a combination of endocrine as well as paracrine regulations which are responsible for the events associated with preterm labor, maturation of the cervix, and preterm rupture of the membranes.
Apart from classical hormones, various pro-inflammatory cytokines act as mediators.
At the fetal-maternal interface - which is formed by the placenta with the chorioamnion on the fetal side and the decidua, myometrium, and the cervix on the maternal side - an intense interaction between endocrine and immunological reactions has been observed.
Melatonin (N-acetyl-5-methoxytryptamine) is a hormone with multiple functions in humans, produced by the pineal gland and stimulated by -adrenergic receptors.
Serum melatonin levels exhibit a circadian rhythm with low levels during the day, rise in the evening and maximum levels at night between 2 and 4 a.m.. Melatonin participates in the regulation of several physiological processes such as seasonal biological rhythm, daily sleep induction, aging and modulation of immunobiological defence reactions.
Furthermore, melatonin has a highly lipophilic molecular structure facilitating penetration of cell membranes and serving as an extra- and intracellular free radical scavenger.
Melatonin seems to quench mainly hydroxyl radicals, the most damaging of all free radicals.
Melatonin may play a role in the etiology and treatment of several dermatoses e.g.
atopic eczema, psoriasis and malignant melanoma.
The influence of melatonin on hair growth is another aspect.
Topical application of melatonin inhibits the development of UV-erythema.
Penetration through skin after topical application and oral bioavailability auxit further investigations on the pharmacokinetic and pharmacodynamic actions of melatonin.
Lung dust analyses were performed on tumor-free lung tissue from surgical samples of 28 carcinoid tumors.
The measured levels in one surgical sample may easily be correlated with the increased asbestos load of the lung due to the patients' occupation as stone mason.
No evidence supporting the correlation of increased chronic asbestos load of the lungs and the development of typical carcinoid tumors of the lung was found.
Analysis of 147 repeat arthroscopies of the knee performed at the Department of Surgery at the Herz-Jesu Krankenhaus, Fulda, from 1990 to 1995, showed that meniscal lesions were the most common (n = 89, 60.5%).
The majority of meniscal lesions (n = 45, 50.6%) occurred in menisci that had already been partially resected.
The most common localization was the posterior third of the medial meniscus in ipsilateral lesions.
Conversely, contralateral meniscal injuries were only documented in 18 cases (20.2%), while de-novo lesions occurred in 29 cases (29.2%).
A coincidence of meniscal injury with first- or second-grade cartilage damage was documented  in 35 patients (39.3%), whereas 54 patients (60.7%) had normal intra-articular cartilage.
Cartilage damage was most frequent in patients who had previously undergone partial meniscectomy.
The most common therapeutic consequences were partial meniscectomy and cartilage-shaving.
Concerning patients' postoperative satisfaction and evaluation of the results by OAK score, the majority of patients attained significant improvement in function (65.2%) and showed good or excellent outcome in the OAK score (88.8%).
Patients without accompanying cartilage damage had better results in comparison to patients with cartilage damage in the affected area (p < 0.05).
In conclusion, in patients with positive meniscal signs and a history of previous meniscal surgery, repeat arthroscopy is generally and early indicated and can be recommended as a valid method to assess cartilage damage objectively.
However, patients with cartilage damage do not have the same benefit.
The present study examined the effectiveness of combined dermatological and behavioural medicine therapy on the skin status and disease-specific stress of eighty-six patients with psoriasis and fifty-eight patients with atopic dermatitis who were hospitalized in the PsoriSol Clinic, Hersbruck, Germany.
In addition to receiving instruction about their stain disease, the patients were offered, practice in relaxation techniques, social contacts and scratching control as well as individual psychological counselling.
The clinical change was assessed by PASI and SCORAD, respectively.
The Marburg questionnaire for coping with skin diseases (MHF) and a questionnaire for health-related control attributes (GKÜ-S) served as psychometric measures.
Patients showed significant improvement in skin status and psychosocial parameters in pre-post comparison.
Social fears, avoidance and helplessness were reduced by significant improvement of the emotional status in both groups.
Patients with psoriasis also showed an increase in internal control attributes.
Dermatological treatment combined with behavioural medicine therapy can be considered an effective method in patients with atopic dermatitis and psoriasis.
Treatment of chronic cancer pain with strong opioids is indicated in about 60-70 % of patients.
Surprisingly, these very potent analgesics are prescribed with great reservations in many countries, including Germany.
The aim of our investigation was to analyse the supply of opioid analgesics to outpatients with cancer pain in the region of Hannover, which has about 1.1 million inhabitants.
In Germany special prescription forms, i. e. triplicate forms, have to be used for the prescription of strong opioids.
At the time when our investigation took place prescriptions for outpatients had to be renewed every 7 days.
For two observation periods of 6 months lasting from January to June 1988 and from January to June 1991 all of the opioid prescription forms that had been issued by general practitioners for clients of the AOK Hannover (one of the major medical insurance companies) were evaluated.
The reasons for prescribing opioids were analysed by recording the diagnosis.
The individual treatment period on an outpatient basis during these 6 months was determined, excluding, e. g. days of hospitalization.
During the two observation periods only 16.2 % (1988) and 19.5 % (1991) of the practitioners in the region of Hannover prescribed strong opioids to outpatients.
The majority of the practitioners consisted of general practitioners and specialists in internal medicine.
Although these two groups mainly function as family doctors who are responsible for the basic therapeutical needs of their patients, only 22.6-33.8 % of these doctors prescribed opioids to outpatients.
In two-thirds of the patients, cancer pain was the reason for prescribing the drug.
The total number of patients with a prescription for cancer pain was 164 in 1988 and 196 in 1991.
Altogether 1002 prescription forms in 1988 and 1065 prescription forms in 1991 had been issued for these patients.
Applied to the individual treatment period as an outpatient, only 36.0 % of the patients in 1988 and 32.1 % in 1991 received a regular prescription of strong opioids every 7 days.
The mean time interval between separate prescriptions was 16.8  +/-  25.4 days in 1988 and 19.4  +/-  29.1 days in 1991.
Accordingly, the majority of patients with chronic cancer pain had been supplied with opioids only occasionally.
Our data indicate a significant undertreatment of outpatients suffering from cancer pain.
Taking into account the estimated total number of patients suffering from cancer, only 14.5 % (1988) and 19.0 % (1991) of all outpatients in need of strong opioids were supplied sufficiently with those analgesics.
Comparing the results from the observation period in 1988 with the results from 1991 it becomes obvious that the situation has not changed.
There are different reasons for the insufficiency of opioid treatment: many physicians as well as their patients are still afraid of the side effects of strong opioids.
Therefore, it is necessary to improve education concerning this issue.
The legal restrictions on the use of narcotics and their complexity are another important reason for doctors not to prescribe strong opioids.
In 1993 the regulations were simplified; nevertheless, this has not led to a profound change in the attitude of the prescribing practitioners.
Thus, further changes in legislation seem to be necessary so that the requirements for the prescription of strong opioids do not differ from other drugs.
The long-term functional results of acetabular fractures are assessed in terms of the corresponding criteria of Merle-D'Aubigné and Postel (pain, mobility, walking).
Other essential criteria include the quality of reduction and the radiological appearance.
A 53 year old female patient developed a keratoacanthoma, present on the left side of her nose for two months.
After repeated unsuccessful trials with cryotherapy, she was treated with intralesional injection of methotrexate performed twice with a weekly internal.
This led to complete resolution within 5 weeks.
Although controlled studies on the effect of methotrexate in keratoacanthoma are not available, the rapid regression and the good cosmetic result suggest that this therapy may play a beneficial role in treating these lesions especially in problem locations.
Between January 1995 and June 1996, 24 inpatients at our hospital (mean age 55.6 years) were treated with electroconvulsive therapy (ECT).
Clinical improvement was observed in 80% of the patients, including those without risk factors (NRG, n=16), as well as those with concomitant cardiovascular diseases (RG, n=8).
During a mean period of observation of 224 days after the end of ECT 7 patients (35%) relapsed.
The rate of relapse was higher in RG than in NRG patients (57.1 vs 23.1%).
In all cases ECT was well tolerated; 285 applications of ECT did not result in mortality or persistent morbidity.
However, RG patients may be at increased risk for the development of minor cardiovascular complications, which were noted in three RG patients (37.5%), but only in one patient (6.2%) in the NRG (Fisher's test, P=0.09).
Taken together, our results demonstrate that ECT is a safe treatment regimen for depression even in medically ill patients of old age.
On 21.11.1811 the poet Heinrich von Kleist and his companion Henriette Vogel were found dead in a small hollow by the Wannsee.
The autopsy revealed that Kleist was shot in the mouth and Vogel died from a close-contact shot to the chest.
The tragedy, which was reflected in letters and documents ended in a suicide pact.
The conclusions of the pathologists were influenced by current medical opinions which were based on interpretations of the ancient humoral doctrine of Hypocrates.
Subjective and objective opinions were mixed together.
Some forensic and historical aspects of this suicide pact are highlighted.
There is no doubt that a single emergency phone number is desirable, but in contrast to other countries, in Germany different emergency phone numbers and dispatching centers exist for the fire brigade (FB), the emergency medical service system (EMS), and the general practitioners' emergency service (GPS).
Due to this fact, valuable time is often wasted by connecting or transferring emergency calls from one dispatching center to another.
The purpose of this study was to analyse all calls received by the different dispatching centers in the city and county area of Mainz with respect to total number, fraction of emergency calls, and specificity.
Further, the total number of calls potentially referring to a hypothetic single dispatching center with a general emergency phone number (112) was calculated.
During a 4-month period, all telephone calls were registered and related to day, time, and origin of the call (city or county) and classified as non-urgent or emergency calls, calls appropriate to the dispatching center dialed, emergency calls to be transferred, or unspecific calls.
A total of 80 987 calls were received (city area 84.3%, county area 15.7%), most of them directed to the FB of Mainz (33 086).
The EMS dispatching center received 31 286 calls, the five GPS-centers 15 256 calls; 1359 emergency calls that were directed to the police or FB needed transfer to the EMS.
During weekdays the EMS and FB received the most calls, with a reduced frequency on Saturdays and Sundays (Table 2).
Nevertheless, the highest total numbers of calls were received on Saturdays due to multiple calls directed to the GPS.
The FB had the highest specificity of calls; more than 50% of the calls to the GPS were unspecific (Fig.
Of all calls, 4.37% were classified as emergency calls; two-thirds of these came from the area of Mainz during the daytime.
During off-duty hours of the GPS in the city, 51% of the emergency calls reached the EMS directly; 49% had to be connected by the police or FB.
During duty hours of the GPS, the fraction of calls directed to the EMS decreased significantly to 35%.
During duty hours of the GPS centers in the county area, only 14% of the urgent emergency calls reached the EMS dispatcher directly (Fig.
Compared to the multiple-center mode, a hypothetic single dispatching center for all systems would probably be followed by a slight increase in total number of calls due to the fact that the GPS numbers would be answered 24 h a day, but there would be only minimal differences in the total number received on most days; only on Sundays would a decrease be expected.
The EMS area of Mainz, with a total of 13 different telephone numbers for 7 dispatching centers, can be regarded as typical of the German situation.
The high number of emergency calls to be transferred (up to 86% under special circumstances) demonstrated that this weak point in the German EMS system must be eliminated by introducing a single emergency number.
This should occur when a Europe-wide three-digit number "112" will be instituted, probably in 1995.
Additionally, the continued existence of 5- or 10-digit telephone numbers for non-urgent calls may be useful for allowing non-verbal differentiation of calls.
In any case, all telephone numbers, including the latter calls, have to enter one dispatching center.
The main advantage of a single dispatching center would be avoidance of the time-consuming transfer of emergency calls from one dispatching center to the other.
In addition to elevated intraocular pressure, a compromised ocular blood supply has been implicated in the pathogenesis of primary open-angle glaucoma (PCOG).
The ongoing change of demographic and economic structures does not undermine employment (as many believe), but this change indeed induces problems with the mandatory old-age security system in Germany.
This paper discusses some popular reform proposals and concludes with another proposal which takes into account economic incentives.
Especially the gerontological aim of a longer lifetime employment is adressed.
Epidemiologic data suggest that an underlying genetic disposition can be detected in up to 10 % of all colorectal cancer patients and autosomal dominantly inherited hereditary non-polyposis colorectal cancer (HNPCC) is the entity most frequently identified.
It was described first by A. Warthin in 1895 in "Family G" and is characterized by a predisposition to an early onset of colorectal cancer and other intestinal or genitourinary tumors.
We report the case of a 61-year-old woman with five different cancers.
Although the strict Amsterdam Criteria were not fulfilled, molecular analysis revealed HNPCC; further genetic testing in the family confirmed that the 36-year-old and so far healthy son had inherited the germline mutation of his affected mother.
Genetic testing in clinically suspected HNPCC cases is recommended for patients with colorectal cancer meeting the Amsterdam Criteria.
In patients meeting one of Bethesda Criteria 2-7 without meeting the Amsterdam Criteria, germline mutation analysis is recommended only in MSI-positive tumors.
Introduction: The Pura-Vario stent features 2 newly designed "bridging segments" for enhanced longitudinal flexibility, in order to allow easier and safer stent implantation.
The median palatine suture has long been regarded as having the greatest resistance to dilatation of the maxilla.
In 1984 Glassman [3] presented a conservative-surgical method of division of the palatineal suture in which only the lateral and anterior support of the maxilla is debilitated surgically.
An orthodontic apparatus cemented in place preoperatively is already used intraoperatively for dilatation of the maxilla.
In the period from 1991 to 1997, 16 patients with a leptomaxilla and various dysnathic findings have been operated on at our clinic by the method described by Glassman [3].
Sometimes the maxilla was dilated intraoperatively using the apparatus cemented in place by the method of Derichsweiler and dilatation was continued postoperatively until the described result was achieved.
After successful dilatation of the maxilla and a stabilizing phase, a mono- or bimaxillary operation was performed.
The use of this method led to the desired result in 15 patients.
Dilatation of the maxilla was objectivized by determining the pre- and postoperative width of the anterior and posterior dental arch using models and X-ray of the occlusal overlay of the maxilla.
In one patient who was operated on at the age of 38 years, a fracture of the alveolar process of the maxilla occurred unilaterally due to the completed ossification of the median palatine suture.
The method of surgically aided dilatation of the maxilla at the level of Le Fort I plane is suitable for patients up to the age of 30.
In older patients, the median palatine suture should be transsected as well.
Osteoarthritis is the most common joint disease.
In addition to known risk factors e.g.
genetics, age and hormonal status it has been suggested that chronic-repetitive micro- and substantial (macro-) injury may play an important pathogenetic role.
In a longitudinal case-study we examined Judo-players for clinical and radiological changes of the finger joints over the course of 16 years.
Arteriovenous fistula is a rare complication following vascular trauma.
We report a case of an arteriovenous fistula of the neck after a penetrating injury.
The only presenting symptoms were a thrill and a machinery murmur.
There were no signs of cardiac insufficiency.
Duplex scan and arteriography detected an arteriovenous fistula between the superior thyroid artery and the superior thyroid vein.
Treatment should be carried out as soon as possible, and is then usually simple and successful.
Pathogenesis: Arteriosclerosis and Mönckeberg's disease mediasclerosis are vascular diseases associated with calcification of the artery wall.
While mediasclerosis in most cases develops in type 2 diabetic patients, arteriosclerosis is the result of a combination of different vascular risk factors.
Möncheberg's mediasclerosis typically involves the tunica media, whereas arteriosclerosis-associated calcifications primarily involve the intima.
The new technique of non-invasive magnetic resonance (MR) sialography was evaluated for normal and various pathologic conditions of the parotid gland.
Ten volunteers and 15 patients with various symptomatic diseases of the parotid gland were tested in the present study.
Diseases included pleomorphic adenoma, cystadenolymphoma, carcinoma ex pleomorphic adenoma, ductal carcinoma, adenoid cystic carcinoma, lymphoepithelial carcinoma, non-Hodgkin's lymphoma, sialolithiasis, sialadenitis, Heerfordt's syndrome and congenital duct ectasies.
In addition to the usually performed T1 and T2 cross-sectional sequences a heavily weighted T2 sequence (TR 3600, TE 800) was performed and allowed depiction of a fluid-filled parotid duct.
Results showed that the main parotid and primary branching ducts were depicted reliably in all normal cases and all patients, except one with sicca syndrome.
Pathological conditions such as duct dilatations, duct strictures, obstructing duct calculus and irregular shapes and courses of the ductal system were demonstrable.
While X-ray sialography obtained a higher resolution, only MR sialography was able to depict dilated ducts proximal from a complete obstruction, as well as all ductal cysts.
Our findings show that MR sialography can be applied successfully to investigations of the parotid gland system.
There have been no contraindications or complications to date because MR sialography is non-invasive.
The technique will also allow the salivary ducts and lesions to be differentiated from the course of the facial nerve.
Substantial improvement in conformal radiotherapy is possible using modulated irradiation fields.
Such modulated fields may be generated even with conventional accelerators by means of individual metal compensators or with the recently available dynamic multileaf collimators (MLC).
For treatment planning a new kind of planning program is required that can calculate the 2 D-intensity matrices for each photon field.
At the German Cancer Research Center (Deutsches Krebsforschungszentrum) such a program has been developed under the name of "KonRad" (Conformal Radiotherapy).
Although it is an independent application, it is proposed for clinical usage to supplement a planning system that is already present.
So-called inverse planning differs from conventional 3 D planning, as the trial-and-error approach for finding good field parameters is nearly completely avoided.
Instead, the radio-oncologist is given the chance directly to specify medically oriented criteria like the prescription dose in the target volume, maximal tolerance dose values for each organ at risk and their weighting factors.
In addition, the so-called DVH optimization allows aimed, partial overdosage, especially in parallelly structured organs in order to obtain better overall planning results.
The Problem Six-year old boy with unilateral Type-II cleftfoot, oligodactyly and clinodactyly of the 2nd toe.
The marked splaying of the forefoot not only causes painful pressure points but also problems with fitting of shoes.
A child with typical signs of the cat eye-syndrom except the characteristic feature of a cat eye is reported.
In a chromosome analysis (47,xx, + mar de novo) an extrachromosome was detected.
Using fluorescence in situ hybridization the supernumerary marker refered to chromosome 22.
In the literature only a few cases show all the characteristic features of cat eye syndrome.
However, there are only two case reports of children without any ocular alterations.
The great variability in the phenotype probably depends on different sizes of the marker chromosome or asymmetric breakpoints on the long arm of chromosome 22.
According to new literature reports there is no correlation between the phenotypic variability and the size of the marker chromosome.
Probably the degree of severity is correlated with the percentage of the patients lymphocytes that contain the extrachromosome.
Introduction: Children with ALL frequently present with skeletal pain at the time of diagnosis.
We retrospectively analyzed the incidence and clinical features of skeletal pain and the correlation between pain and radiographic findings.
Objective: Elevated levels of interleukin-1 (IL-1) and Interleukin-6 (IL-6) have been reported after cardiac operation, during inflammatory process and cardiac allograft rejection.
Although several groups proved the evidence of a negative inotropic effect, the actual mechanism is not completely understood.
Speaking generally it is possible that low molecular weight proteins are capable of altering myocardial contractility on the level of the contractile apparatus.
Therefore this study analyzes whether IL-1 and/or IL-6 influence myocardial contractility on the level of the contractile apparatus.
Methods: During aorto-coronary bypass operation, human muscle fibers were excised (n=32) and skinned using Triton-X-100.
The experimental skinned fiber model excludes membrane-related factors such as receptor activation and provides direct examination of the contractile apparatus itself.
Different concentrations of IL-1 and IL-6 were applied (pIL-1/IL-6 1-2x10-5-10-11M).
Force generation, calcium sensitivity, and velocity of force generation and relaxation were measured.
(Experiments were carried out at optimal length, bath temperature 23 °C, and isometric conditions.)
Results: None of the skinned muscle preparations of the human myocardium showed under the given experimental setup a significant change in contractility and relaxation after exposure to IL-1 and IL-6.
Despite using nonphysiologic concentrations of IL-1 and IL-6 (pIL-1/IL-6 10-5M) no significant effect occurred.
Furthermore no difference in calcium-sensitivity of the contractile proteins following addition of IL-1 and IL-6 could be observed.
Conclusions: Thus, there is no experimental evidence for direct modulation of the contractile apparatus by IL-1 or IL-6.
Given these results it is possible to exclude some potentially negative inotropic cascades that are mediated on the level of the contractile apparatus as the molecular mechanism.
These data show that therapies which support myocardial contractility during sepsis by stimulation of the contractile proteins do not seem to be very promising.
Indications for intercarpal and radiocarpal resectionarthroplasty and fusions are osteoarthritis, KIEHNBÖCK'S disease, rheumatoid arthritis and several posttraumatic disorders of the wrist joint.
The resection of carpal bones leads to severe instability patterns of the wrist.
In conclusion we recommend resection-arthroplasty just for treatment of the thumb carpo-metacarpal osteoarthritis.
Implant resection arthroplasty of the lunate and scaphoid or total wrist implants are still causing multiple problems regarding heavy load.
Therefore this implants should be confined to rheumatoid patients.
Of the limited carpal arthrodeses the scaphotrapezium-trapezoid arthrodeses is the most frequent performed procedure.
It can be indicated for STT-osteoarthritis, KIEHNBÖCK's disease, scapho-lunate instability and scaphoid pseudarthrosis if other surgical procedures had failed presuming there are no signs of arthrosis in the radiocarpal joint.
Persisting pain especially in heavy work is quite frequent after limited arthrodesis but can be greatly releaved by simultaneous wrist denervation.
In advanced cases of osteoarthritis total wrist arthrodesis is still the best choice for the patient.
Increasing numbers of monitors at the anaesthesiologist's workplace, providing more than 20 different parameters of the patient's condition, have already made it impossible to record all the values in a handwritten form.
Consequently, this most common method of record-keeping must be incomplete and inaccurate.
In recent years computerised data-acquisition systems have been introduced into clinical practice in order to produce more reliable records.
But after a 7-year experience in the use of such a system in cardiac anaesthesia, we have recognised certain problems that remain to be solved before automated record-keeping will achieve wider acceptance.
The first is the handling problem, which was discussed in a previous paper [11].
The second major problem is the appearance of artifacts, caused mainly by mechanical manipulations during the operation.
In this paper, 300 courses of anaesthesia that were recorded on-line during different cardiac surgery procedures were examined and the incidence as well as the kind of artifacts occurring were evaluated.
Algorithms were developed for each haemodynamic parameter to suppress these artifacts automatically by a subsequent analysing process; the efficiency of that "artifact filter" was validated in 35 of the 300 cases.
Based on more than 30,000 values for each parameter, the incidence of artifacts was 3%-7%.
However, only 0.1%-0.5% of the artifacts could not be eliminated by the filter.
The method described here provided acceptable graphic printouts of the most important haemodynamic parameters (Figs.
1b and 2b) and would also be suitable to serve as an input filter for automatically running anaesthesia data-examination processes, which are currently being developed in our clinic.
Extracorporal shock wave application (ESWA) has been used in the treatment of stones located in kidneys, bile, pancreas and the glandula parotis.
In the last 2 years several studies have shown the benefit of the ESWA on the treatment of soft tissue disorders.
The aim of this study was to explore the effect of high energy extracorporal shock waves in patients with painful calcaneus spurs.
83 patients who underwent medicophysical treatment without benefit were treated with 3000 impulses of 0,30 mJ/mm2.
Follow-ups after 12 weeks and 12 months showed that 51 of 83 patients became pain-free and 20 patients improved from the treatment.
The results are showing the benefit of the high energy extracorporal shock wave application in the treatment of chronic plantar fasciitis.
In developed countries, medical conditions, rather than lack of food, are the main contributors to malnutrition.
Undernutrition is especially common in older persons, occuring in 5-12 % of community-dwelling older persons, in 30-61 % of hospitalized older persons, and in 40-85 % of persons in long-term care institutions.
The multi-factorial nature of undernutrition in the elderly forces a structured differential diagnostic approach to determine underlying causes.
Heightened physician awareness of nutritional problems and prompt risk assessment is imperative to prevent the sequalae of undernutrition.
This structured approach to the differential diagnosis is essential to evaluate potentially reversible causes of malnutrition.
The number of surgical procedures performed as day surgery has significantly increased in recent years.
Therefore, a safe and short postoperative recovery period has become increasingly important.
The aim of the present study was to investigate perioperative cognitive and physiological function after oral premedication with low-dose midazolam (3.75 mg), especially during the postoperative period.
Heart failure may be defined as a reduced physical per-formance frequently caused by a defect in myocardial contraction.
According to the New York Heart Association, the severity of heart failure is classified into four grades (NYHA I-IV).
Predominantly underlying causes are coronary artery disease, hypertension, cardiomyopathies and valvular heart diseases.
Psychic disorders were studied with a naturalistic design in 125 consecutive patients of a medical-geriatric department in a general hospital.
Based on the clinical examination and the values of the Mini-Mental-State-Examination (2), 51 patients were classified as unable for diagnostic procedures concerning psychic state.
The other 74 patients underwent these diagnostic procedures including clinical investigation and three screening-scales (Geriatric Depression Scale (11); Hospital Anxiety and Depression-Scale (4)).
If these examinations led to the suspicion that a patient suffered from a psychic disorder, an interview was performed by a psychotherapist with experience in gerontopsychosomatic treatment and information was collected from the medical and nursing staff.
Dementia was detected or excluded by neuropsychological tests.
Psychic disorders were found in 41 patients, mostly adaptation disorders and depressions, the disorder was estimated to be relevant for the whole hospital therapy.
The screening instruments turned out to be reliable, so they can be recommended for further use.
Difficult to answer remains the question, how the treatment of the psychic disorders - in our sample necessary for each 5th to 6th patient - can be implemented in a medical-geriatric department.
Based on the "Trauma Registry" of the German Society of Trauma Surgery, an interclinical quality management (QM) system was implemented.
The principles of the QM system as well as the differences in the quality of outcome and treatment are presented.
The analysis uses the data on 2,069 severely injured (ISS = 22  +/-  14) patients from 20 hospitals collected prospectively and anonymously between 2/93 and 12/97.
Outcome quality was analyzed by the TRISS method and Z-statistics.
The Z-value of the whole series was -0.24.
There were three hospitals with more than 150 patients that had a Ps value calculated by the TRISS method.
Clinic A had a good (-2.49), clinic B an average (-0.3) and clinic C (3.62) an adverse Z-value.
The assessment of treatment quality was performed by criteria concerning both preclinical and acute clinical phases.
Clinic C had a prolonged preclinical treatment time (90 min vs 62 min in clinic A) for severely injured (ISS > 15) patients.
At the same time, the preclinical intubation rate for severe thoracic trauma (AIS > 3) was lower (44 %) in clinic C than in A (62 %).
With 14 min clinic A had the shortest time until basic radiological and ultrasound diagnostics were completed (X-rays of chest and pelvis and abdominal ultrasound) in cases of severe blunt trauma (ISS > 15), compared to 54 min in clinic B or 31 min in clinic C. Also, cranial computed tomography for severe traumatic brain injury (GCS < 9) was applied significantly faster in clinic A (after 36 min) than in clinic C (after 62 min).
Delayed diagnoses were defined as the difference between the ISS at discharge and the ISS at completion of diagnostics in the emergency department; this criterion was met best by clinic A with an ISS difference of two patients compared to five in clinic B and four in clinic C.
For invasive catheter procedures both ionic and nonionic contrast media (CM) with excellent tolerability are available.
The governing practical factors for CM are X-ray opacity and biocompatibility.
Tolerability of a contrast medium is governed among its physical properties by its viscosity, osmolality, and ionic concentration.
In Germany the nonionic CM are currently preferred.
Because of its low thrombotic complications, the ionic CM Ioxaglat is an important alternative in high risk interventions.
In patients with known CM incompatibility, the prophylactic application of H1-receptor antagonists and corticosteroids allows catheterization safely without complications.
In impaired renal function, hydration is the most effective prophylactic measure to be taken.
Background: In the present study we evaluated the influence of topical miotics on intraocular pressure and the blood-aqueous barrier after uncomplicated phacoemulsification and PC-IOL implantation.
A judgement on the patient's quality of life cannot be based solely on the information about the clinical severity of a disease.
Very often there is no correlation between these parameters.
It is necessary to assess the quality of life by a health status question-naire since non-life threatening diseases common in dermatology influence the quality of life very much.
The most frequently used questionnaires are the SF-36 and the Nottingham Health Profile.
However, these forms do not evaluate all dermatologic patients adequately.
Therefore specific tools such as the DLQI (Dermatology Life Quality Index) and Skindex have been established for dermatology.
Further disease-specific questionnaires have been created to mea-sure time related changes in dermatological patients.
We surgically treated twenty patients with axillary hyperhidrosis by liposuction using tumescent regional anesthesia.
After a description of the surgical technique results are presented.
Except for trivial hematomas, no complications were seen.
Every patient noted a significant reduction of sweat gland activity in the follow up period.
Long-term results remain to be seen.
The value of cytogenetics performed simultaneously with histopathology was evaluated in patients with myelodysplastic syndrome (MDS).
Clonal karyotype changes of the bone marrow cells supporting the histological diagnosis were found in 38/69 cases (55 %).
The chromosome aberrations, especially complex changes, were significantly correlated to distinct histopathological findings such as atypias of the haematopoietic cell lines and myelosclerosis.
Complex karyotype changes were further associated with short survival of the MDS patients.
Our results demonstrate that cytogenetic analyses are helpful in supplementing the histopathological diagnoses.
Recent developments in molecular cytogenetics even allow the detection of chromosomal aberrations in non-dividing cells from cytological preparations or tissue sections which may become available for routine diagnosis.
In the course of 1 year, Clostridium difficile-associated diarrhea, which may lead to pseudomembranous colitis and therefore may be very harmful in frail elderly people, was diagnosed in six patients of a geriatric clinic.
The disease is associated with antibiotic therapy, due to an overgrowth of the intestinal flora with Clostridium difficile.
Symptoms varied from a state of asymptomatic carriage or benign diarrhea to acute stages of the disease with severe diarrhea, abdominal pain, fever and acute phase response.
Diagnosis of Clostridium difficile associated diarrhea was established when, in addition to typical clinical symptoms, a toxin-positive stool specimen was found.
Oral vancomycin was effective in all cases, leading to a stop in the diarrhea and an amelioration of systemic inflammatory parameters.
According to recent results, in order to prevent the induction of vancomycin-resistance and in view of higher treatment costs, metronidazole is considered as the drug of choice in mildly and moderately ill patients.
This report analyzes 46 cases of personnel-to-patient transmissions of hepatitis B (HB), hepatitis C (HC) and HIV in health care settings.
Similar circumstances were found for transmission of HB (40 cases, 404 infected patients), HC (4 cases, 224 infected patients) and HIV (2 cases, 7 infected patients).
Cases with the highest number of transmissions (one anesthesiologist with 217 HC transmissions, and one EEG technologist with 75 HB transmissions) were attributed to poor infection control practices.
As long as infected health care workers (HCW) adhere to general infection control measures, a risk for transmission to patients exists only from infected surgeons who perform'xposure-prone invasive procedures'.
Whether changes in duties of infected HCW are necessary should be decided on an individual basis.
Often, the infected personnel were assumed to have acquired the disease occupationally.
Medical practices and devices bearing a risk of infection should constantly be reviewed with regard to risk for patients and personnel.
The healthy newborn infant also has the right to optimal monitoring in order to detect any disturbance in postnatal adaptation as early as possible.
The introduction of painless, simple, and yet reliable methods, e.g., pulse oximetry and transcutaneous bilirubin screening, has considerably improved the situation for obstetricians and midwives.
Injuries of the spine in children rarely occur.
They amount to about 0.2 % of all fractures and dislocation and to 1.5 to 3 % of all lesions of the spine.
The younger an injured child is, the more likely it has sustained a lesion of the upper cervical spine.
This spinal segment in comparison to adults is concerned more often and accounts for 50 % of all C-spine injuries.
Important differences between the adult spine and the spine in the child disappear with the age of 10 years.
Later diagnostics, classification and treatment correspond widely with the principles valid in adults.
The knowledge of the normal shape and development of the spine are crucial in avoiding misinterpretations of X-ray films.
Typical examples include the confusion of synchondrosis with fractures or of subluxations of the atlas and the C2/C3 segment with "true" instabilities.
Relevant lesions always are accompanied by clear clinical symptoms.
Specific injuries of the growing axial skeleton are lesions of the cartilaginous endplates and "fractures" of the synchondrosis.
Although a variety of histologic entities were described, primary tumors of the trachea are rare findings.
Over a period of 20 years, 30 patients underwent 31 tracheal resections in two hospitals for thoracic surgery.
Among them 4 patients had thyroid carcinoma involving the trachea.
In these patients a strumectomy combined with tracheal resection was performed.
One re-operation for erosion bleeding of the innominate artery on the 8th postoperative day was successfully performed.
All patients showed excellent long-term survival.
Principles, methods and results of percutaneous therapy in acute and chronic vascular alterations of the subclavian artery and its branches.
Speculations concerning a possible association between temporomandibular disorders (TMDs) and ear symptoms of otalgia and tinnitus have been made in the dental and medical literature for a long time.
Current understanding of this association is reviewed.
An analysis of relevant studies published between 1947 and 1996 shows that a relatively high percentage of TMD patients reported the presence of ear pain and noise.
However, a cause-effect relationship has not been established to date.
Theories that try to explain the concurrence of TMD symptoms and ear symptoms (particularly tinnitus) by a common underlying cause remain speculative.
It has to be taken into consideration that due to their high prevalence, TMDs and ear symptoms in a given patient may be present by chance alone.
A methodological weakness of most of the studies available is the fact that control groups were not considered.
Owing to the lack of prospective, controlled, and randomized studies, statements regarding the effectiveness of certain dental measures for the treatment of otalgia and tinnitus in TMD patients are not well supported.
Our report describes a 46-year-old woman with self-inflicted oedema of the left leg and the left arm.
She induced leg oedema by an elastic bandage tourniquet and arm oedema by holding her arm dependent and immobile.
A preexisting disorder of the affected leg (postthrombotic syndrome) and of the affected arm (hypoesthesia subsequent to surgical injury of the plexus brachialis) delayed the diagnostic proceedings.
Our case report shows that: -  Confirmed presence of organic disease does not exclude limb oedema of self-inflicted origin.
-  Oedema resulting from a tourniquet and "hysterical oedema" can be developed by one and the same patient.
-  Effective care of such patients is only possible if dermatologist and psychiatrist work together all the time (liaison psychiatry).
Purpose: This study was conducted to control improvement in the high preoperative prevalence of TMJ symptoms in patients treated by long-term orthodontic therapy for class II malocclusion.
Patients and methods: A total of 57 patients were examined at least 8 years after surgery, 37 having received orthodontic treatment and orthognathic surgery and 20 surgery but without orthodontic treatment.
Myofunctional, disk and condylar symptoms were recorded according to the Krough-Poulsen scheme.
Results: Both groups showed a normal maximal interincisal distance.
The deviation during the opening movement was mainly sigmoidal in the group with orthodontic treatment and terminal in the other group.
Muscular pain predominated in the group without orthodontic treatment.
Clicking sounds of the TMJ were registered in 70% of both groups.
Occlusal interference and a higher interocclusal distance when speaking were found more often in patients without orthodontic treatment.
Preoperatively, clicking and crepitation sounds had been recorded in 60% of both patients groups.
Conclusion: In conclusion, a high postoperative prevalence of TMJ dysfunction symptoms was found in patients with class II malocclusion 8-10 years after orthognathic surgery with or without orthodontic treatment.
Both groups often exhibited TMJ clicking and crepitation sounds, whereas the patients that had not received orthodontic treatment had a higher prevalence of occlusal interference and muscular pain.
The synthesis of pS 2 protein is induced through estrogen-dependent transcription of the pS 2 gene.
The presence of the pS 2 protein in breast cancer is thought to be as valuable as receptor status, or even more so, in predicting the response to hormonal therapy.
Furthermore, pS 2 appears to be a prognostic factor for primary breast cancer.
In 162 cases of primary breast cancer, pS 2 was tested by immunohistochemical procedures on formalin-fixed and paraffin-embedded tissues.
Staining was evaluated semiquantitatively using an immunoreactive score (IRS).
The concentrations of pS 2 in tumor cytosol were determined using an immunoradiometric assay.
Positive staining for pS 2 (IRS >= 2) was seen in 27 % of the tumors.
Comparison of immunohistochemical and biochemical detection (26 % of tumors had pS 2 cytosol concentrations above the cut-off value of 26 ng/mg cell protein) revealed an 81 % concordance rate (r = 0.76; P < 0.0001).
Univariate analysis showed no significant correlation of immunohistochemical pS 2 detection and age or menopausal status of patients, tumor size, tumor grade or nodal status.
However, the immunohistochemical pS 2 status correlated significantly with the immunohistochemical detection of the estrogen (ER; P < 0.001) and progesterone receptor status (PR; P < 0.0001).
pS 2-positive tumors were ER-positive in 66 % of cases and PR-positive in 73 %; 89 % of pS 2-positive tumors were positive for ER and/or PR.
The incidence of immunohistochemical pS 2 detection was 41 % in the group of steroid receptor positive carcinomas (ER- and/or PR-positive) in contrast to 7 % in steroid receptor negative tumors (ER- and PR-negative).
Patients who have undergone coronary artery bypass grafting may develop acute myocardial infarction late after surgery.
It is not exactly known in these patients whether acute infarction is predominantly caused by occlusion of bypass or native vessels.
Also, there is no systematic and prospective data available with respect to an invasive, revascularizing therapeutic approach.
Therefore, acute coronary angiograms were obtained in 21 consecutive patients with acute infarctions and remote bypass grafting to elucidate mechanisms causing myocardial infarction in these patients, and to assess results of catheter-based recanalization.
We report the clinical and laboratory results of a family where one boy and one girl presented with a clinical picture resembling the X-linked agammaglobulinemia known as Bruton's disease.
Both children showed severe bacterial infections starting at the age of around 6 months, a lack of all immunoglobulin classes and absence of mature B-cells in the peripheral blood.
With respect to reports from the literature these results are yet another indicator for the existence of an autosomal-recessiv disorder with the same clinical make-up as Bruton's disease.
A deletion on chromosome 14 leading to the disorder was identified.
Conservative treatment of genuine stress urinary incontinence in females gained more and more interest.
The use of mini-devices is one of the newly developed therapeutical options however, its clinical relevance and longterm-results are still under debate.
This review article gives a critical evaluation of the available urethral plugs and regulators and new developments as well according to the longterm-follow-up studies in the literature and own experience with those devices.
The continence rates that can be obtained with the different plugs or regulators are dependent upon the degree of stress incontinence, ability to insert the plug and compliance of the patient.
Reported longterm results vary between 48 % and 100 %.
The most frequent side effects are urinary infection, haematuria and/or handling problems with the devices.
According to the published material it is impossible to give therapeutical standards for treatment of female stress urinary incontinence with urethral mini-devices.
Although proper Patient selection might give excellent longterm-results in patient continence rates.
Background: In contrast to the correction of simple myopia there is no widely accepted technique for the correction of myopic astigmatism.
Currently two techniques are available: the photoastigmatic refractive keratectomy (PARK) and the combination of arcuate keratotomies with standard PRK (PRK-T).
Although there are randomized data for CABG vs. medical therapy and CABG vs. PTCA in primary therapy of CAD, there is few evidence on the appropriate therapy of recurrent angina after prior CABG.
We analyzed data from 1265 consecutive patients (PTS.)
presenting for recurrent angina after previous CABG who required either re-CABG (n=67), PTCA (n=768) or medical therapy alone (medRx) (n=430) at our institution during 1986 through 1996.
Outcome after index therapy is monitored during 45  +/-  34 months.
The 3 therapeutic groups were similar with respect to gender (84 % male), age at therapy (60 years), prevalence of diabetes (22 %), and time to first ischemic event after primary CABG (37 months).
Actuarial survival was significantly higher in the PTCA-group at 1, 5 and 10 years after therapy of recurrent angina, despite the freedom from subsequent re-intervention was significantly lower (1-year-survival 95 % [37 %] vs. 95 % [3] medRx vs. 79 % [4 %] re-CABG, 5-year-survival 87 % [57 %] vs 78 % [17 %] medRx vs. 50 % [4 %] re-CABG and 10-year-survival 72 % [65 %] vs. 63 % [31 %] medRx vs. 50 % [15 %] re-CABG resp., p < 0.0001, [numbers in brackets represent corresponding values for incidence of re-intervention, p < 0.0001]).
These findings were similar after adjustment for different baseline characteristics.
Due to advances in surgical methods, such as miniplate and lag screw osteosynthesis, there is current discussion about the adequate therapy of condylar fractures.
Regarding the insufficient outcome of conservative treatment confirmed by refined methods of functional diagnosis, there is a trend towards surgical therapy, at least in cases of condylar displacement out of the fossa.
This trend was also prompted when surgeons learned that the condyle determines local growth but does not serve as a growth center of the mandible.
Along with increased interest in temporomandibular function and surgical therapy of internal disorders, surgical therapy of traumatic soft tissue lesions was emphasized.
This consequently led to surgical restoration of intraarticular fractures.
Conservative treatment will nonetheless be sufficient in cases of minor displacement due to a higher ability of remodeling, even more so in children.
A case of a 37-year-old woman with symmetrical bilateral apocrine hidrocystomas at the lateral margins of the eyelids is presented.
The symmetrical, simultaneous and bilateral appearance of the lesions, the lack of association with other abnormalities and the absence of the lesion in the family history make this case remarkable.
The situation of intensive care units (ICU) in Germany was analyzed by a national survey.
Questionnaires consisting of multiple-choice and short-answer questions were sent to ICUs of university hosptitals, hospitals with >1000 beds, 500-1000 beds, and hospitals with <500 beds separately with regard to the different disciplines (anesthesia ICUs, surgical ICUs, cardiac surgical ICUs, neurosurgical ICUs, neurological ICUs, mixed-surgical ICUs, internal ICUs, interdiscipline ICUs).
The personality organisation and the process of therapy of drug-addicted patients are examined by the comparative analysis of 15 single cases.
The antisocial tendency is emphasised as the main clinical feature.
It is related to specific genetic traumata and the externalisation of parts of the superego.
During the therapeutical process, the antisocial tendency destroys the therapeutical relation.
If it is possible to continue therapy beyond this point, the patients can now enter into a process, in which new identifications and the integration of parts of the superego are involved.
Approaching the end of the therapy, patients, again, tend to destroy the results of therapy if one does not consider specific problems of the separation process.
Objective: The Uppsala-definition of leukoplakia has recently redefined oral leukoplakia.
Based on this definition, the aim of our study was to reevaluate the prevalence of oral leukoplakia in patients with histologically proven primary oral cancer.
Design: A total of 101 inpatients in four tumor centers in Berlin were interviewed and clinically examined just prior to surgery of an oral squamous cell carcinoma (OSCC).
Results: The prevalence of leukoplakia immediately adjacent to the carcinoma was 15.8%.
Additional leukoplakias without relation to the carcinoma were found in 4% of the patients.
There were no significant differences in age- or sex-distribution, history of tobacco habits or diet  between patients with or without leukoplakia.
T1 carcinomas were found in 62.5% of patients with, and 24.4% of patients without associated leukoplakia, whereas a balanced distribution was found for the pre-operative staging of the tumor.
Conclusions: The prevalence of oral leukoplakia in patients with OSCC was low, compared to retrospective studies.
The presence or absence of leukoplakia indicated no influence on the prognosis of the tumor, except of tumor size.
The results emphasize that most OSCC develop from healthy appearing oral mucosa.
Cutaneous angiosarcomas mainly arise on the scalp and face of older patients.
They present with reddish nodules or plaques and tend to bleed and ulcerate.
Angiosarcomas show an aggressive and recurrent course and have a high potential for metastasis.
We report on a 48-year-old patient with unilateral eyelid edema as the first manifestation of an angiosarcoma.
The clinical presentation, the history of contact allergy, the presence of antinuclear antibodies, and abnormal thyroid function tests favoured a non-neoplastic disease.
However, multiple biopsies confirmed the diagnosis of a highly differentiated angiosarcoma.
Staging of the patient revealed no metastasis.
After radical surgery including orbital exenteration and postoperative radiation therapy, no recurrence was observed with a follow up of 26 months.
This case underlines the importance of including angiosarcoma in the differential diagnosis of unilateral eyelid edema.
The Marburg Cardiomyopathy Study (MACAS) is a prospective observational study designed to determine the value of the following potential non-invasive arrhythmia risk predictors in more than 200 patients with idiopathic dilated cardiomyopathy (IDC) over a 5-year-follow-up period: New York Heart Association functional class, left ventricular end-diastolic diameter and ejection fraction, left bundle branch block and atrial fibrillation on ECG, QTc and JTc-dispersion on 12-lead ECG, abnormal time-domain analysis and spectral turbulence analysis of the signal-averaged ECG, ventricular arrhythmias and heart-rate variability on 24-hour Holter ECG, baroreflex sensitivity, and microvolt T wave alternans during exercise.
Abstract   The observation of extremely variable clinical courses for patients with renal cell carcinomas of an identical pathological stage as well as a comparable histological differentiation resp.
growth pattern strongly indicates the existence of tumors harboring different biological aggressiveness.
Currently available histopathological classification systems do not predict the biological behaviour of renal cell cancer as sufficiently as the establishment of a therapeutical strategy adjusted to the individual patient would require.
The need for a more refined characterization of the biological potential of the indidual tumor results from the introduction of modified operative strategies as organ-preserving surgery, for example, as well as from the recently suggested application of an adjuvant systemic therapy adapted to the individual risk for tumor recurrence resp.
the development of progressive disease.
Therefore, the clinically orientated basic scientist and the basic scientifically orientated clinician intensively try to determine prognostically important biological variables which would allow to better predict the biological aggressiveness of a single tumor in addition to "classical" prognostic parameters (T-stage, histological grading, growth patterns).
In this context, several biological parameters including the identification of alterations on the DNA-, RNA- and protein level have been discussed as possible biological prognostic markers for renal cell cancer.
The present review tries to reflect currently available biological characteristics of RCC which might gain clinical importance with regard to an individualized therapy in the near future.
Until now reports of factitious disease have not been found in the ENT literature.
In contrast, the dermatologic literature estimates an incidence from 0.01 to 0.26%.
In order to achieve effective treatment for these patients, knowledge of the characteristic symptoms is fundamental.
The present paper describes the variety of disease possible, using three cases treated between 1992 and 1994 in the ENT Department of Cologne.
According to the literature, females are involved in a ratio of 9:1, with the majority working in medically related professions.
Depression and anorexia are typical symptoms.
When a factitious disease is suspected, psychiatric consultation is essential.
Confrontation of a suspect patient by the otolaryngologist is not often considered because several reports quote suicidal behavior in up to 25% of self-manipulating patients and tendencies to refuse to follow psychiatric treatment are considerable.
Numerous different diseases lead to scarring alopecia with irreversible follicular destruction as a common ending.
Current classifications are based on clinical, histopathological or prognostic parameters, as well as on pathogenetic criteria which allow only a rough assessment because the precise mechanisms leading to scarring alopecia are still unknown.
Inadequacies of the established classifications are obvious when regarding special forms of scarring alopecia like lichen planopilaris or pseudopelade Brocq.
In order to develop more satisfying classifications, recent insights into biology and pathology of the hair follicle and follicular cycling have to be considered.
The most important structures for the survival of the hair follicle are the epithelial stem cells which reside in the follicular bulge and the fibroblasts of the dermal papilla including the molecular communication between these two cell populations.
Research in the field of scarring alopecia should aim at defining the pathological processes on any of the above mentioned levels which will lead to an irreversible damage of the hair follicle thus allowing the development of new therapeutic agents.
Rheumatoid neutrophilic dermatitis is a rare dermatologic disorder seen in patients with active rheumatoid arthritis.
Clinically firm erythematous 3-5 mm papules are found mainly on the arms, the hips and the proximal thighs.
The lesions may be pruritic leading to excoriations and crusts.
Histology reveals a dense dermal infiltrate with neutrophilic granulocytes, while leukocytoclasia may be seen, vasculitits is not observed.
This overview of rheumatoid neutrophilic dermatitis may help remind the practioner to include this uncommon disorder in the differential diagnosis of rheumatoid arthritis-related dermatoses.
Background: The rehabilitation of low vision patients is of increasing importance since the number of these patients has grown rapidly.
We wanted to evaluate the actual spectrum of patients concerning age and diagnoses and the appropriate low vision aids (LVA) in 1 year.
It is generally accepted that most inguinal hernias should be operated electively.
This study presents a risk calculation challenging this view.
Three strategies are presented: prophylactic indication on principle (A), elective operation in every second case (B), and operation in case of strangulation only (C).
On the basis of available epidemiological data it is calculated that, for the male German population aged 65 years and over 69 954 (A), 36 292 (B), and 2630 (C) inguinal hernia repairs would be necessary annually; 167 (A), 145 (B) and 123 (C) perioperative deaths would occur, connected with 1702 (A), 1373 (B) and 1048 (C) years of life lost, respectively.
Thus, operation of every inguinal hernia would result in a (small) reduction of life expectancy.
These data provide evidence that in elderly patients the indication for operative treatment of inguinal hernias should depend upon symptoms and suffering.
There is no reason to operate on asymptomatic patients because of a presumed risk of strangulation.
Since first described by Kibler (1955) hyperalgetic areas of the skin in company with arthropathy or diseases of internal organs are known to be a useful sign to define the affected segment.
While seldom utilized by physicians, physiotherapists frequently make use of these special findings concerning the skin as a common part of their daily work.
A certain problem exists in ranging correctly the corresponding segment of the spine, this mostly caused by the inaccurate idea of anatomical facts.
The actual as well as the former literature in this field shows very different views and opinions, all of them rather in contrast to the real anatomical findings.
In the following the topographic-anatomic conditions are presented of which exact knowledge is necessary to evaluate the palpation's result "Kibler's plica positive" relative to its diagnostic valence.
Aim of the study and methods: In the present study the correlation between ischemia induced ventricular tachyarrhythmias and a dynamic behavior of ventricular late potentials was investigated.
In 16 patients with significant coronary artery disease and survived sustained ventricular tachyarrhythmia an electrophysiologic study (EPS) was performed.
Before EPS (t1), at every stimulation interval and after induction of a ventricular tachycardia or ventricular fibrillation (VT/VF) the lactate concentration was measured in arterial blood and in the coronary sinus for calculation of the myocardial lactate extraction.
Furthermore, before investigation, after induction of a VT/VF and after a 10 minute recovery phase an analysis of the signal averaged ECG was performed.
Nine patients showed a so-called "lactate reversal", i.e., an increase of the lactate concentration in the coronary sinus over the concentration of the arterial blood as an expression of ischemia development, during inducibility of a VT/VF (group A).
The control group consisted of 7 patients without ischemia related VT/VF (group B).
Results: In group A significant changes of the three late potential criteria were found between t1 and t2 (QRS:115.61 +/- 13.86 vs. 126.06 +/- 16.74, p=0.08; RMS: 25.81 +/- 22.26 vs. 13.11 +/- 10.72, p=0.01; LAS: 37.72 +/- 19.26 vs. 50.06 +/- 10.72, p=0.01).
In group B, no significant changes could be measured.
Furthermore, the prevalence of late potentials increased in group A from 66% (t1) to 89% (t2), whereas in group B no increase was detectable.
Conclusions: These data suggest a dynamic behavior of ventricular late potentials in correlation with the inducibility of ventricular tycharrhythmias due to ischemic circumstances.
Therefore the dynamic behavior of ventricular late potentials can be an expression of a modification of the arrhythmogenic substrate in arrhythmia endangered patients.
Recent studies and reviews continue to report a high mortality associated with the acute respiratory distress syndrome (ARDS), which involves a severe inflammatory reaction within the whole lung that is frequently associated with multiple-organ failure.
Important factors contributing to the poor results in severe ARDS are the aggressive procedures required to maintain sufficient arterial oxygenation, such as mechanical ventilation with high inspiratory pressures and high inspired oxygen concentrations (FiO2) which themselves contribute to the progression of the disease.
As no specific therapy that reduces or prevents the general inflammatory reaction is known, current therapy is limited to procedures that minimize peak inspiratory pressures and FiO2.
Therefore, pressure- and volume-limited ventilation modes with positive end-expiratory pressure, controlled hypercapnia, differential lung ventilation when appropriate, positioning (particularly prone), and aggressive dehydration are used.
Should these procedures fail to improve arterial gas exchange, the patients may be additionally treated by veno-venous extracorporeal gas exchange.
To reduce the risk of severe haemorrhagic complications due to high levels of systemic heparinization, systems internally coated with covalently bound heparin, which allow a lower level of systemic anticoagulation, should be used.
From April 1989 to August 1993, 89 patients were transferred to our intensive care unit for treatment of severe ARDS; 52 were treated by combining the described conventional methods without artificial gas exchange (survival rate 88%) and 37 additionally underwent artificial gas exchange (survival rate 57%).
The overall survival rate was 75%.
On the basis of these experiences, we conclude that this step-by-step approach may improve survival in patients with severe ARDS.
Cutis marmorata teleangiectatica congenita (CMTC) is a rare congenital vascular disorder of the venous system.
In 50% of cases there are associated anomalies of other organ systems.
